It seems that Sly, wanting to be taken as more than the big dumb lug who won his way into peoples' hearts by boxing (Rocky) and fighting wars (Rambo), took it upon himself to expand his repertoire and become a more verbose, thoughtful hero for big, muscular Italians the world over to look up to. So one of them ended up being 1986's Cobra, where he plays a lone cop who kills hundreds of slimy criminals. Another film was supposed to have been a remake of Angels With Dirty Faces starring him and Christopher Reeve... unfortunately, the powers-that-be (whoever they are) decided not to have Sly and Supes sully their intellectual property and nixed the project. I guess they figured it was okay for Robert DeNiro and Sean Penn to sully it up a few years down the road, but whaddyagonnado?
PS: I tried to google to see if I could find a picture of her garden now, but to no avail. I would love to see how it’s grown.
The first is the "safe" option. The same design and fabrics, in reverse. The second uses the same grey and the same colours but the fabrics are different, pieced in rows with a border. I've dropped them off at the shop but haven't had any feedback yet so don't know which (if any!) the customer chose. It was fun to work from a brief for a change, so thank you mystery customer!
Companies Involved in Hyperphosphatemia Therapeutics Development 17
Not sure how to put in shelves, install a disposal under your sink, change a tire, or figure out what kind of wall anchor you need to hang a heavy clock? Instead of calling for help or abandoning the project, first look for videos on YouTube that will show you exactly what to do.
Ah, the meeting rooms. With the Keynote session over, we split into four rooms for various simultaneous sessions. Four small rooms, but still more than adequate. I like a modest-sized room. It's not as intimidating as a huge auditorium. But some speakers traveled all the way to China to talk before just a dozen other people.
The team, the fire services and the police are working together to determine the root cause of the fire and an update statement will be released in due course.
Happy Cinco De Mayo Loves! This is honestly one of my favorite holidays because I am a true lover of any and all Mexican food (could eat it everyday) and I am a serious tequila lover. I swear give me some good tequila and I am a happy lady. I was reading my new Bon Appetit last weekend and I came across an article tittled "How to Mix the Ultimate Margarita". Umm, yeah I devoured the article and then I promptly made both Ritas, nevermind it was only 3:00 in the afternoon but it had me wanting one. Now they are household favorites. I know you will all love the Blackberry Rita but don't snub the Jalapeno one. I know it sounds weird but trust me it is really good in a crazy way. If you like a little spice and heat you will love this drink! Try them both and let me know what you think!
“The whole idea of language being foreign is kind of disappearing,” he said.
Norm had a followup appointment at the orthopedic surgeon on Thursday. The fracture has not started healing yet but it has not moved either, and that's a good thing. So he is to remain in the Stormtrooper-like immobilizer at all times, except when showering, which is what he was doing when I snapped
Alan Loney / a propos(ition / 54-56
$1.00 off Ronzoni Healthy Harvest
On her site, she has a recipe for Broken Glass Jello. I've seen variations of this in Mexican grocery stores and eateries, but haven't seen one with such vibrant colors. I had to make this...and you should too!!! So easy, so little labor, and so much fun to eat. Sure, it doesn't require the usual KitchenAid mixer, imported sea salt, 72% cocoa chocolate or Tahitian vanilla beans...but sometimes, we need something simple! :) And I think kids would love this!
It almost feels as if everyone I work with now is more real than before, sharing some sort of adventure. You know: wait tables by day and write a groundbreaking novel at night-the characters based loosely on a cast of regular customers. But the truth is, I don’t know of anyone doing that. All they do is come in the next morning saying “I really don’t want to be here right now… I can’t believe I had that many drinks last night. I was so f***ed up”
I really struggled with this one - makes a change huh - NOT!
I had a huge chicken (almost 7 pounds). I put it on a rack in a roasting pan and rubbed the skin with olive oil, salt and pepper. I put two lemon halves in the cavity with a bunch of flat leaf parsley.
grilled hake
All Candy girls can enter and attend the Candy Style Awards 2012 event by presenting the coupon (see picture below) at the registration table table. One (1) coupon admits one (1) person only. In case no Coupon is presented, a copy of the Candy magazine (May issue) is available at the entrance for purchase.
The government’s housing strategy published last month highlighted the range of steps being taken to increase the supply of new homes.
He plans soon to head for Castelhill each Saturday (via plane from Albury) then drive to Wangaratta for the mass at 5pm. More news anon!
Growing more terrible as the day
Deep inside, each person knows about everything in this world. This knowledge is present in every person. You are a part of this whole phenomenon. As your consciousness opens and the whole system gets physically, mentally and spiritually elevated, your life becomes worth living. A higher state of consciousness will not drop on your head from heaven one fine morning. The sapling of consciousness is within you – it needs to be nurtured with simple techniques of meditation. Some palm trees yield in three years, some in ten years. And those that are not nurtured never yield! They simply exist…
There are a number of tools available out there, and some are even Open Source and/or Free!
9And he has been our guide to this place, and has given us this land, a land flowing with milk and honey.
The Spanish Civil War - Hugh Thomas
Jennifer nodded as she lead him into the house just as barren as ever. “Oh I can call him, let him know that you’re waiting to talk to him?” she guessed not having the least clue what the guy might want with Mr. Rollinsmith. Whatever it was, it wasn’t anything in which she felt the least bit of curiosity.
Enregistrement: 1958-2011
-Like anyone is going to know if you ran out of whole wheat pastry flour and you just use regular flour. Just do you, girl! We’re not gonna tell anybody.
Ready to take your obsession with playing Hemp Tycoon to the next level? High Times' 2012 calendar has twelve months of tips on cannabis cultivation. It's the best thing you could possibly buy your stoner nephew, besides a case of Cool Ranch Doritos. (Calendars.com)
And camel told by Christ the True.
Barb-Harmony Art Mom
For us a refuge twixt this fated wall.
Yesterday was not quite that interesting for me but had increasing levels of unexpectedness. My blog yesterday morning was titled Guess The Name of the Comedian and the clue was that the un-named comic “does just sometimes use prostitutes. Mostly in Soho”. Interestingly, two other comedians suggested the self-same name to me. But they were wrong. This other now-famous TV comic whom they named clearly needs to do something about his image among his peers.
So yeah, read my review, buy this disk, and shut the fuck up (oops, did I type that or only think it?). Standards are eroding all over the place -- like Frank Zappa once said, "Either you get it or you don't." Here's hoping you do. More on the AnimEigo release here.
What would you do if you were a billionaire?
It is a great place to visit but would you want to live there? One thing is certain; if the “Occupiers” applied for political asylum they would be denied. Maybe Obama will use his pied pipe and lead these other unhappy Socialist somewhere else. It would be easier to establish his Kingdom in Africa where there is a lot more space and he could be happy. He already has family ties there and the boys even look like they could be his sons.
I’d love to hear your great marketing ideas!
I read a PR release from a company named Unified that says it has a new product that can "activate social audiences on all media ecosystems simultaneously." It's a freakin' dream come true.
If parents don’t have the skills and resources to manage a party properly, they should think about having professional crowd control to monitor and assist them.
If you do join Tadaa, look me up. My username is iphonephotog. Or, you might find my images in half of the feeds right now because they are trending, featured, and in the 24 hour charts. I’ll be happy to share your best images to help you get more followers.
Well-known New Orleans chef John Besh has put together an unforgettable collection of Southern recipes that anyone passionate about Southern cooking, or even just curious, should want to read. I like it because they are the staples from my childhood and therefore recipes that I really would eat at home and can prepare on my own, without any special skills or knowledge, as “chefs at home” books often are. It has the corn pudding, two recipes for fried chicken, fried catfish, cheese grits, angel biscuits, drop biscuits, buttermilk pancakes, sloppy joes, baked beans… with a few little ‘inspired’ recipes thrown in for good measure. I would love a paperback version because this bound version is large and heavy (and beautiful). I am biased when it comes to Southern cooking, so I think everyone should have a copy of this.
Here is my version. I got eager and didn’t wait for it to cool all the way. If you let it cool all the way you can get a nice pretty cut like the picture above. I plan to make more and just store in the freezer and warm up when I’m in need of a sweet fix. Which is like, everyday.
The problem I have with this suspension is not that I don’t think Torres deserves it (he does, mostly), but that it provides zero deterrent for other players who play close to the same line. Any player viewing the leagues response immediately knows that the severity of the suspension has nothing to do with the hit, a little to do with the resulting injury and almost everything to do with Torres. 25 games for being Raffi. It’s such a long suspension that only Raffi Torres could receive it, which in effect nullifies its value as anything other than a reactionary punishment.
Ponting celebrated his first century in India while completing his third run before raising his bat in triumph. Not only had he kept his vow of improving his average in India, but he had also broken a record. The century was Ponting’s16 as Captain, he was previously tied with Steve Waugh and Allan Border on 15.
This dress takes a long time to make- each tiger stripe is drawn then cut out by hand and appliqued on.
THING IS: "good query" does not necessarily equate to "query that gets obscene amount of requests." "Good query" means "query that entices agents who are a good fit." Maybe that 43% request rate is the sign of a savvy writer who did enough research to know EXACTLY who would be interested in his work, and queried appropriately. There are all sorts of variables we don't have the resources to factor in. When you're trying to fit a story to a personality, you can't account for the rejections you'll receive. Maybe they love the concept, but were looking for a literary voice, and you're super-commercial. Maybe they love the commercial voice, but the concept is too girly for them. We don't and can't know.
I then excused us, and we went on our merry way. We had loads of fun at the beach, by the way. Fun that I wouldn’t have come close to having if it hadn’t been for my children.
I know for some of you May seems too far away to even think about, for others too soon, but I'm counting on there being enough Goldilocks for whom this sounds just right. You?
I am horrible at dieting. Always have been. I think because it’s all about numbers.
When did you start your blog? 2 days ago...jeeze..it already feels like its been forever! lol...Kidding!!
You will be there, won't you?
Read more at Thanhnien News
Turmeric powder – 1/4 Tsp
it has tiny pieces, so we're now onto a cars themed puzzle with larger pieces. :)
Batting
I’ll remember him for several things, the foremost being his fantastic textbook with Motoo Kimura: An Introduction to Population Genetics Theory, the book that taught me the theory underlying evolutionary genetics. It took me a year’s hard slogging to work through the equations, but it was the most rewarding learning experience I ever had in graduate school. The book was long out of print, but I see you can once more obtain it from Amazon at the link above. If you’re a grad student in evolutionary genetics, get it and work through it.
-m4w
It is the custom to say that Zionism was responsible for this development. But Zionism is to be understood, in the worldview of the Islamic mind, in another perspective. With the collapse of the Ottoman Empire and the birth of intolerant Arab nationalism, long-dominated nations (such as the Armenians and the Jews) sought independence. This was understood by the Arab world as a rebellion not only against the new Arab nation-states but also against Islamic law, which puts non-Muslims in the inferior status of a dominated nation: the dhimmis.
As a conclusion, creationism is bad....because it reverts you to an amoeba like stage, and that would be such a pity, since you've come a long way. How can they still think that the Earth was created 6000 years ago? What about all those then thousand - million year old fossils? Creationists, what is your final argument?
This pillow cover making adventure helped me to discover that my sewing machine has a serger-like function. Who knew?! Turns out actually reading a product manual can be SUPER helpful. Cannot tell you how many times this stitch would come in handy over the years (I'm still kicking myself for not realizing this sooner - perhaps it's time to grab a cup of coffee and read the manual from start to finish).
I do have faith in the beliefs of my religion but I still can’t work out all this Universe business. Is it any wonder that I throw myself into my writing? It stops me from thinking about these brain-exploding issues.
I particularly like this one because it's so bright and in winter I usually opt for fairly dark and dull colours or no colour at all if you know what I mean .
These books show one thing–that God is truly in control of our lives. Without Him, we cannot succeed. Without Him, we cannot have the courage face trials. With Him, we can do all things! Jesus’ second coming will happen. As to when, only Father God knows. As believers of Christ, let’s make a difference in our lives. We are also called to “make disciples of all nations.” With God, we can make this happen. Make a difference now.
160g cold water
“That’s the one.” he tells me with an ominous look.
But the chance is still there as a positive trend seems to appear on the corporate bond market. In its 2010 annual report, Indonesia’s market watchdog (BAPEPAM-LK) reported a total of 29 corporate bonds and sukuk issuance during the year which raised fund of 36.6 trillion rupiah ($4.3 billion). The value increased by 17.71 percent from the previous year, the report said.
The best thing about it is the crust stays constant but the toppings change. I sure have done quite a mixture of toppings with it. The first time I ever had this crust it was with green apple, sweet onion and gouda cheese – I was a little hesitant but it was absolutely fantastic and is now one of my favorite topping combinations. A traditional classic is fresh mozzarella and juicy tomatoes with a pesto sauce – can’t get much better than that.
You hear some C.E.O.’s say they have to export jobs to compete with other countries. I find that a lame excuse . Does China export their manufacturing jobs to other countries? Think about it, they are taking all of the manufacturing jobs and keeping them in their country. People say that anyone can become a C.E.O. of a company. I say that they are off base on that one also. Now low-end jobs are either shipped to other countries or they are eliminated all together, so moving up the chain is not there any more.
Combine quinoa, vegetable broth, tomato sauce, onion and oregano in a large saucepan and bring to a boil.
When the sunshine hits the gold dome.. The entire world is brighter. It’s our history, it’s our life and no matter what happens. we will keep fighting and Sacrificing until we get it back .
Let’s not forget the Alberta Progressive Conservatives are supposed to be … well conservative. In theory, they are a “right wing party.” Much of their base was certainly conservative leaning. But in recent years, many conservatives, disillusioned with the PC party’s drift to the left, defected to Wildrose.
Brazil is battling crushing poverty affecting millions of its citizens, great disparities in household income and sprawling shanty towns in the midst of high-rise pockets of plenty.
The square boxwood or myrtle shrubs included water as an element of the structure. There was a narrow pool in the center and small shapes of fountains of bubbling, gurgling water. “Oh, how soothing that sound is.” Some modern homes enjoy the gentle, relaxing sound of water provided by small electric fountains.
Is alive and growing only in the viewpoint of the viewer.
Writing a great sex scene that isn't porn is just like painting a portrait.
“They discussed the deterioration of China’s human rights situation, prospects for reform, and recommendations for US policy,” the White House said. “He reiterated his view that greater openness and protection of universal rights is the best way to …
“Celebrating taking criminals off the street with little thought to their imminent return to society is foolhardy,” Gingrich wrote in the article, which was co-authored by Mark Earley, a former attorney general of Virginia.
In the case of Haiti, there’s every reason to think that aid delivery is going to be slow, and far slower than appears acceptable in the face of a disaster of this magnitude. It will be easy to point the finger at governments, charities and the UN for not overcoming obstacles in their way and doing what they’re supposed to do best. However, let’s take a moment and look at why aid has been- and will continue to be- slow reaching Haiti’s victims.
The greater profitability of the media in a deregulated environment has also led to an increase in takeovers and takeover threats, with even giants like CBS and Time, Inc., directly attacked or threatened. This has forced the managements of the media giants to incur greater debt and to focus ever more aggressively and unequivocally on profitability, in order to placate owners and reduce the attractiveness of their properties to outsiders. They have lost some of their limited autonomy to bankers, institutional investors, and large individual investors whom they have had to solicit as potential “white knights.”
Add the milk mixture and 1 egg to the flour mixture and mix on low using the paddle attachment on the mixer until a loose dough begins to form. Add the cranberries and walnuts and replace the paddle attachment with a dough hook. Mix on low speed until the dough forms a smooth, elastic, and slightly tacky dough, adding more flour by the tablespoon as needed until the dough starts to ball up and stick less to the walls of the bowl. It should take about 4 minutes of mixing. I use the windowpane method to decide whether the dough is done mixing, stopping when I have at least achieved medium gluten development.
His wife's tears turn to anger as she returns with a suitcase. "I'm going to stay with mummy in Shropshire and maybe, maybe if you sort yourself and snap out of this 'evidence' garbage I'll consider coming back. Who do you think you are anyway, calling me a cretin!?"
Well there you are, my two favorite guys. I can't believe you're turning 3 tomorrow, and at the same time I can't believe you've only been in my life for three years. I don't remember what it was like without you. You are my little best friend, my teacher, and the coolest 3 year old I know : )
I can read, online, the list of his slaves; Hector, Limerick, Moir, Sally, Marget and Daphne. And the children Cuffie, 8, Mary Anne, 1, Prudence 5, just to name a few. There are no pictures, but the names strike almost the same note to me as Catrin of Berain.
I couldn't sleep on Tuesday as I was fretting over the consultant's appointment yesterday and as it turned out I was right to be fretting as the appointment was a total disaster! I brought my post-operative appointment forward as I'm still in pain and my stomach is all mis-shapened since the operation and it looks like something has taken a big bite out of me. I thought it was just swelling but it's not going down, looks truly awful and is seriously getting me down. When I phoned the consultants secretary we arranged it all so the consultant would be there and I get there yesterday only to find that he's not even there and I had to see one of his useless underlings and all I got was being told to take painkillers (Ibuprofen) and do some abdominal exercises...... a total waste of time and energy as I can't take Ibuprofen as it has a coating and they go through my system and come out in the stoma bag completely whole so do absolutely nothing, and I can't do any sort of exercise as I'm in pain! I'm so fed up, why is it just one kick in the teeth after another, is it too much to ask for something good to happen for a change? I don't know how many more of these stupid setbacks I can put up with!
One Final Thought
i'm one of the gals who never dreamed about her wedding - how it would be, what theme would take place, nor if i ever wanted to take the plunge - but here's some eye candy i'm all about for 'wedding' stuff -- maybe i'm starting to dream a little - i said DREAM - not READY! *just to make clear*
Nothing says ‘vacation’ like coming in to a cold, darkened room to find your covers turned back and little bitty gold wrapped chocolates set out neatly for your culinary pleasure. There is no better way to end a full day. And even though that night is far removed from us now and exists only in our memories, by reliving it here, it’s exactly how THIS night is ending as well.
eventually.......
ZACH: But, I can’t.
Apparently, “If a woman was to walk up to a mall directory, a camera inside would take a photo. It will recognize her gender, age and race and instantly provide an ad for the appropriate products. So, if the shopper is a 30-year-old woman, she might see adds for makeup, shoes and clothing”.
On top of that I wore a strapless dress to the shoot since it was the more complicated outfit to put on. We were in such a rush to get there I forgot our third outfit, AND my bra!! So our amazing photographer had to make sure you couldn't see any goodies in the photos with the white shirt!
Old Charter Proprietor's Reserve and I.W. Harper Gold Medal. Since I don't know when exactly these bottles date from, I'm not sure if these two were made at the Bernheim distillery or the old Belmont distillery. Both labels were made by Belmont until UDV bought the distillery and tore it down. In its place, they opened the Bernheim distillery in 1992 and then sold it to Heaven Hill in 1999. The Harper brand is still owned by Diageo but bottled only for export, and the Charter brand is now owned by Buffalo Trace. Trace discontinued the Proprieter's Reserve label around the same time they got rid of Weller Centennial.
Our first Gala was for our new ballet/lyrical studio. It is it's second year in operation, but WOW!! The elite dancers (middle and high school kids) were the very best I have ever seen, and I've been to a whole lot of dancin'. Many of the HS girls go to the performing arts magnet school and desire to go to college for dance. Their training is evident and it was amazing to watch them. I know my girlies will be viewing the DVD we ordered of the show many times over.
Let their voices be muffled
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to believe that the value I experience as myself as the experience I have to and towards sex and relationship is my creation and natural, and not ever consider that this experience I have as the minute fluctuations and intricacies and flavours and subtitles has been given to me and determined for me.
The case had been reffered back to the upper district court, which has found that the only difference in the position does not prevent the risk of confusion in a sufficient way.
If you answer these two questions correctly and within the timeframe, you will also be entered to win two movie tickets to SOMETHING BORROWED and I'll also send you your choice of candy for the movies if you're brave enough to sneak it in!
Hi there, Blog Buddies! I'm kinda stoked about this one! I was immediately inspired by the brilliant colors on the sheer, soft fabric, but it took a long time for me to decide how to execute it. I wanted to see the soft, translucent texture that I thought coffee filter paper would provide. I am very happy with the results. They even look a little like a natural butterfly wing.
When you're an adult, it can be difficult to form close friendships. Most of my close friends have come from Internet fandom, so it can be difficult to meet people in the real world, unless you're really outgoing. It may be stating the obvious, but I'm not! The author goes on 52 "girl dates" and chronicles her experiences. This book is funny, and if you're in the market for a new good friend, I suggest you check it out!
Christians should not be surprised by this trend, but we should take note as we deal with our children (Eph 5:15-16). As more and more of our kid’s generation become deadbeats there will be a general expectation that this type of lifestyle will be accepted in your house (1 Cor. 15:33-34). You will have to work harder to reinforce your expectations that they grow to be independent.
West Point Holiday Special ... FOX NEWS ... 1 AM *NEW
Sleeping to the solstice, heat rising,
Designers will be asked to commit to a six month term commencing April 1st 2011 through to the end of September 30 2011.
All good things must come to an end, to make room for the start of other good things.
And here I thought she had heard it all. Perhaps this time it seemed to her more an act of violence, a violation, something much more personal- after all, she was not on the street or in the subway but in her own room- all of this verbal filth coming in through her own window- invading her own private space. And I was not there to protect her.
The delegations that travel with presidents should be chosen on the basis of their economic significance, not their loyalty to the party in power.
The Chinese Grand Prix proved to be another thriller, with wheel to wheel racing, right up to the final lap. Formula 1′s stop in Shanghai, wraps up the first Asia leg of the 2012 season, as the teams head to Bahrain this week
In the mid-90's she came to London, working in a charity hoping to raise funds for one of the NGOs. It was meant to be a temporary gig before she headed out into some new war but there she met Arthur. He was like many of the war-wounded she'd helped over the years, mentally broken and terribly damaged emotionally. It was about this time he met Gwaine, and was being recruited inot the Knights Templar.
Well, as a family all is wonderful. We are enjoying life and being together as a family. Nothing makes us happier than when we spend time with each other. Having the blessing of being able to be together and watch our children grow, is just such a GRAND experience and we THANK GOD everyday for such blessings!! We have done a couple of camping times. This summer, we took a 2 weeks vacation and did some RVing and spent some time at the coast. Just tons of FAMILY time. Since we have a pool, boy, we have DEFINETLY had some great use out of it. The boys LOVE going swimming!!
Scrabblefinder and similar sources say it is a legitimate Scrabble word, but they don’t provide a definition for it. Lexic.us defines it as “a lie” and offers examples of its use dating back to 1823. Wiktionary defines it as “untruth, falsehood.” You can find many examples of its use and, from context, that is how most writers seem to mean it, as synonymous with lie.
Attached is a joint statement (see below) so talks will begin in 3 weeks. I will try and be constructive.
"Uhh no I'm not!" he insisted. "I'm not in honors reading or writing and I'm not in AP geography," he continued.
(we made two large pans of this, served 11 adults healthy servings,including seconds and thirds for a couple of them, and had a full pan leftover. It isn't pretty, but it is tasty.
destiny … for me and you
So, fast forward to last week, and we bump into none other than Pat Roy on our walk to the beach:
So, if you don’t know who I am, then I’ll use this first post to tell you about myself.
"He didn't deserve that," she said.
I will offer caution to those who are huge animal lovers. This book is not for those who are easily overcome by animal death. There are several heartbreaking moments, and each one brings a tug on the heartstrings.
*Flashlights are a pain in my butt. All of our stupid Rayovac crappy-crap batteries that I had stored for an emergency, LEAKED! So the flashlights are all slowly dying, being over used by the children, and being misplaced. The best source of light the last two nights has been the pillar candles I've had in the cupboard for fancy table settings. They seem to burn pretty slow and shed a lot of light. I've gone through 3 and have 1 left. Wish I had a 20 pack of those in my 72 hour pack. It would be nice not to worry about running out. Small, light weight, energy efficient lanterns would be nice too. (Turns out, I did have 100 hour candles in my pack...just didn't know/remember.)
You Asked: I need to walk my husband to the plane door.
CHICKEN: with smaller hook
Ao has now chosen to follow in his mother’s footsteps and pilot the Nirvash to protect his island, even if his island doesn’t like him. It may get him killed, but that’s what he feels he needs to do. This week he learned not everyone resents him, as Eureka saved many lives in the Nirvash, and many of those people remain grateful, like the good samaratin. Unfortunately his sister represented the other side; those who would sell Ao out for a quick buck or passage to the US.
Subs from: Nash, Delap, Whitehead, Etherington (if fit), Diao
It’s not too late to stop these people, these elites. But the hour grows late. Very late. It’s time for REAL CHANGE we really can believe in! It’s time for a really NEW WORLD ORDER! But it’s not the kind that Obamy and the Bilderbergs are advocating! It’s time for change and a now of FREEDOM AND DEMOCRACY instead of this rule by the elites that now strangles every one of us all over this planet!
There are many resources available to help you find non-GMO choices:
I'm still primarily a YA writer. I'm still primarily a YA reader. But the problem is, YA is not a genre in the same way that, for example, fantasy and sci-fi and mystery are genres. Because you can have all of those things (and more) under the YA umbrella.
We look back with gratitude for all who have gone before us, mindful that it was through their struggles… their sacrifice of lives and dreams that made this dream of freedom a reality for you and I.
Thanksgiving Style Bread Salad
The fact is that, for a short while after they arrive, some immigrants are forced to do the jobs which:
This recipe is absolutely the most horrible thing that's ever been done to a piece of beef in the history of food. It's absolutely revolting. Our house version was, you took the steak and dumped the seasoned flour all over it and then beat it to death with a toothed mallet for about 20 minutes, turning it over and scraping all the frag and flour off the board and dumping it back on and whamming it in until the meat was pale gluey Easter pink and thin and holey enough to read a newspaper through; and so huge you could use it as a bathmat. Then you just flopped in in the pan with everything else and let it boil for an hour while you stood over the stove with a Pall Mall dangling from your lips and poked it with a fork.
Lou: I have also used the Pretty Sweet CD for my card with very simple mat and layering. The image has been mounted onto a large heart adorned with flowers and swirls. My pearl element is the 2 decorative pins used to hold the shabby ribbon roses in place.
Today we wrapped up our first of two classes here in Austin, Texas. Tomorrow, we’ll begin our next class which is the CERT Program Manager class. Yesterday I introduced you to two students that are in our class representing the Yselta Del Sur Pueblo Tribe. Today, I’d like to introduce you a few others in our class that helped add to our diversity.
You are the destination I escape to from eyes looking down upon me, judging my intent.
Dropping a glove in a public place means you can soon expect a rude awakening.
This week's Sponsor is: Pink Cat Studios
LRGP have also been one of the teams racing hydraulically interlinked suspension and have looked at other ways to legally alter the suspensions performance. It seems this work has lead to the discovery of a new form of Inerter, primarily using fluid for the Inerter effect. This new development has been termed by the team a “Fluid Inerter”.
So aside from an obsession with the weather, what else has been happening?
Thousands of Filipinos watched the PH-Sri Lanka game at Rizal Stadium. Among the attendees were ABS-CBN big boss Gabby Lopez, Manila Mayor Alfredo Lim, and Philippine Azkals First Lady Angel Locsin.
This is a rather queer affair
By Robin Roshkind, Esquire, West Palm Beach, Florida
So it's probably no surprise that one of my favorite designers on the new Project Runway: All Stars is Kenley. She has a very vintage, retro aesthetic (remind you of anyone??)
And the power round:
The last show, which was at the Paramount, was a different kind of affair...it was, somehow, more tentative, like they were asking, "Do you all still love us?" and as a result, played a lot of old stuff, and just a bit of new, which was OK, but not anything compared to the oldies. This time, though, it was much more like a rock concert, like their confidence had been restored. And, I will say, the stuff off the new album - that they recorded with Justin Timberlake and Timbaland - was VERY good. Much better than anything they've released since I was in college, anyway.
Do you do anything for the Oscars? I don't normally make anything extra for Oscar night, mostly because the Boy usually has a baseball practice that night...and guess what....the Boy has a baseball practice on Oscar night! At times, I think I should do more to observe these sorts of things but in reality, that's not going to happen so I do what I can.
chevy volt
Sing-song and off-key and just plain wrong.
Why it pays to forgive your ex
So, as difficult as it may be to imagine a landlord whose net income is less than $10,000 a year, imagine how difficult it is to get competent legal advice when your ex-husband doesn’t pay child support, and he’s an active duty soldier. I can’t tell you how many times I was referred to Legal Aid over the past 3 1/2 years, but I can show you the dated stationery they used to tell me No. The most recent time I went to the VA hospital, and the administration there directed me to Anna’s boss at a branch of Legal Aid concerned with finding employment for returning vets. She directed me to Anna.
Heat up wok and put in the vegetable oil. Saute garlic until fragrant. Add both Chinese chives and bean sprouts. Fry for a short while. Add salt to taste. Put in a little water if the dish is too dry. Serve with steamed rice while still hot.
I like how the seahorse has green leaves around the sun flowers on its tail and also how a plant is growing in the foreground. Green symbolizes for us balance, adaptability, growth and potential. It seems to suggest that there is the potential here to adapt to circumstances better and bring things back into balance that will bring you the joy you hope for.
without worrying about the nuns being annoyed at my children.
The second is O’Connor herself, who is an utterly mesmerizing presence – a horrid little monster, who slips imperceptibly from croaky vulnerability into shrill, fierce rage. She performs angry little dances like a Tahitian savage. Chloe is incensed that Eleanor and Connor made out, but this seems physically and psychologically impossible. Connor is such a huge hunk that when, in a rare plea for tenderness, he bends over to hug the tiny Eleanor, their heads do not even touch. They more often resemble a strapping Peter Pan being mobbed by an embittered Tinkerbell. But these characters are so furious and self-absorbed that they would probably start biting chunks out of each other’s bodies if they ever found themselves locked robotically in congress.
The music started and the emcee, Eamonn Holmes announced, “Our next contestants are Bob B. and Jessica Rush”. I walked along the route that I had been instructed to walk and tried to match Jessica’s pace by watching her from the corner of my eye. She did the same. We arrived at the podium at the same time and shook hands. We introduced ourselved to each other. Jessica stated that she was a nanny and that her area of expertise was pop culture. I stated that my area of expertise was literature, history and geography.
Hello! I am so flattered to be here at
DH said reviews for the KOBO were the best of all the e-readers, but I haven’t had a chance to really play with it just yet. Last week was mid-term week, and I’ve still got a couple of projects to get done, but as soon as I have time, I’ll glue my nose to the KOBO! LOL!
While he was telling the story he made sure to point out that the first time he saw me I wasn’t caked in makeup nor was I wearing a dress. Turnouts have a way of making everyone look the same. They’re big and heavy – they hide your body shape. The point is, a relationship should never be based on the way you look. There will come a day when your boyfriend will see you without makeup, perhaps you’ll be wearing sweats or you’ll be having a bad hair day, if they truly like you it shouldn’t matter if your hair isn’t perfect or if you break out and refuse to hide behind foundation and pressed powder.
The Auditions will begin at 2:00 p.m. on Sunday, September 21, 2008 at Media Dance Centre; 237 East Palm Avenue; Burbank, CA 91502. For further information, please call Media City Ballet at 818-972-9692 or visit online at www.mediacityballet.org
She grew up DIRT POOR and I do mean POOR. She was the daughter of a share cropper in East Texas and they "didn't have a pot to pee in", as she would say. :)
The Fairness in Asbestos Abrasion Resolution Act would boldness all awaiting and approaching asbestos lawsuits, removing the cases from courtrooms. Senate hearings alpha today, and legislation could potentially ability the Senate attic by the end of the month.
I had 10 turs to do it, and every goblin dead had a chance to enter back into the game on the next turn. I actually won on the 10th turn, which was the most exciting part of the game. Not a lot happened otherwise as it’s usual on LotR published scenarios. Not a lot of tactical depth either. I find I enjoy this game more with my Isildur’s Bane solitaire hack which adds a lot of uncertainty to an otherwise dull gameplay. Most of the pics were taken by her, therefore they don’t suck. Also, that good camera (my brother’s) got recently stolen, so I’m sharing this mainly cause of the great pics. Enjoy!
This 'Pinkham Way Incinerator' website was told at the weekend that a couple of government ministers live in Muswell Hill. That should reduce the likelihood of Pinkham Wood ever being built! ... But Pinkham Wood should be more than just a successful nimby campaign, pushing the waste plant into an area with poorer and less influential people.
It was after that concert that he proposed. The happiness I felt then was overwhelming and, looking back on the scene, I was still amazed at how that grew beyond what I thought possible. The screen skipped to our first kiss as husband and wife, I remembered the love, finally enjoying the tranquility I thought I could have. On the screen, everything faded.
They have not expressed those views because they have been taught to feel guilty about them by a tiny minority with monopoly access to the communications media, and they have never yet voted in support of those views because they have never yet been offered a viable Nationalist alternative.
Miscellaneous papers
The main character must decide whether to ________. If s/he decides to do (this), the consequences/outcome/peril s/he faces are______. If s/he decides NOT to do this: the consequences/outcome/peril s/he faces are________.
game of marbles disturbed his siesta. There were also some
Around the time I left school, my mother became an elected official in our community and I was beginning to pay attention to the conversations that were going on around me, as well as in the world. I began to become aware of the common ideas or notions I was being told throughout my life were not true at all, so when my brother handed me the Teenage Liberation Handbook one afternoon, it was like another piece of the puzzle. It was also the sanest idea I ever heard!
In the meantime, another Northern Irish writer is working his tats off. Wayne Simmons has landed two awesome reviews lately. Stop by his site to read reviews with Lawrence Block and Charles Ardai! Then buy his book, FEVER.
Er, confession time, lol! I can't fully remember how I did this one :-)!!!!!!! When will I learn to jot a few notes down before I send things off!!!!!!!!!!!!! I know I started off by spritzing lightly with a mauve and a green Glimmer Mist spray onto a cream tag and then I think I added a bit of colour with Cut n Dry foam from an inkpad but maybe not. I then stamped the dragonfly and a small flourish round the edges using a mauve Archival inkpad and followed with the little quote using black Versafine. I then stamped the dragonfly once onto pale green vellum and once onto pale mauve and each time embossed with an interference pearl embossing powder. I then cut them out, added a little coloursoft pencil and then added a little Stickles to the wings, spreading it out with my finger. The wet glue caused the wings to curl but when they were dry I found by embossing them lightly with a ball tool I got them to behave as I wanted and I layered them ontop of each other onto the tag just gluing the bodies. I added the pearls as a finishing touch.
2010.07.29 Iraq Shurqat 4 11 A Fedayeen suicide bomber takes down four Iraqis.
3. The people sitting at the table next to you share with you that they've already been to "the light show" four times (it costs $25 each time!)
Vanessa and Owen wanted to build a snowman. The snow wasn't packing very well so we built a baby snowman. Vanessa was very good at getting all of the supplies needed for the nose, eyes, mouth and arms. She also wanted to put a hat on it. She told me while building the snowman that we needed a hat so it could come alive just like Frosty. When we finished and she put the hat on it, she sat in front of it waiting for it to move. I had to explain that snowmen don't actually come alive. She was very disappointed and sad. If I could have made it come alive, I sure would have.
Not necessarily fatal to democracy. But the other?
Pour the caramel into the bottom of the pan, and swirl it around a bit to spread it up the sides about a 1/2 inch.
So seriously, you've never seen Breakfast at Tiffany's? Man. That movie was a huge for me. And I will never forget the first time I saw it. I had moved to Lubbock to go to school at Texas Tech. I was down, missing my parents, all that first-time-leaving-home stuff. The first night I was there one of my dear friends (who I have known since I was six and she was two) came to my dorm with a sleeping bag in one arm and Breakfast at Tiffany's in the other. She set up her sleeping bag in between my bed and my roommates bed and we all plopped down and watched the movie. It was awesome. I can't really tell you why, except that it IS. But it was just a feeling that everything was gonna be ok, that I wasn't alone. I guess I wrap all those warm fuzzies up in my feelings about this movie. Thanks for that Nat.
Surely we should give up all our material comfort and go help them?
i guess i didn't sleep very well last night.
“They said that it was long past time
In addition, I have seen only 2 or 3 peahens, one of whom had 3 of the smallest peachicks (Is that the right word?) I have ever seen with her. The disappearance of so many peafowl has made The Ancient One wonder if the goal was to eliminate the flock rather than just thin it out. In the absence of a public outcry, I guess I'll never know.
There is a still a week to participate in our current challenge, Red White and Blue (for kids) for a chance to win one of two great prizes! And, as always, remember our kids inpatient in Children's Hospitals and send in your cards if you can.
Fall is my FAVORITE! There's just no other way to explain it.
My criteria:
Laser surgery tends to be less painful, quicker healing, and less bloody since the light beam seals bleeding vessels or cauterizes them. We want to stress that LASERS CANNOT CUT BONE, therefore, they CANNOT BE USED TO CORRECT BUNIONS, HAMMERTOES OR ANY BONE DISORDER The laser is a very useful tool for today’s medical practitioner. It has specific uses and is an advantage when used together with more traditional treatments. Unfortunately, the laser does not do away with the need for anesthesia prior to surgery.
(black against black as they mount to the rising sky)
He didn’t finish or anything…he just got up, said he had fun, and left.
If you look carefully, you will see now the star or poinsettia in the final shape (I'm pointing it with my finger in the picture below). Then place it and glue it on the paper that will be the color of the flower or star.
It happens when you start playing drums at eleven years old. Oh, and it happens when you keep company with musical cohorts who amplify their sounds. That's me...hidden behind the cymbal above--backing up Louise M. who handily won our high school talent show when I was a sophomore. My band had just finished our number...Brother Louie, a Stories cover song and a couple of us just remained on stage to back up Louise. I kid you not, my hair was almost as big as the cymbal concealing it.
4 pkg. 3 oz Jello (lemon, orange, lime, strawberry)
many gods,
Yep- She really IS blind as a bat! You know on those eye charts the one BIG letter that is at the top of the chart? She could barely make it out.
Some of Cortiglia’s messages illustrate the point:
Al-Raas’ appeal will be heard Nov. 22.
MINE:
With an age difference of 14 years, he having a girlfriend, and she having a kid, how on earth were they meant to be together ?
The one you bring to you lips,
Hypoglycemic, diuretic and hypocholesterolemic effects of roots of W. somnifera (ashvagandha) were assessed on human subjects. Six mild NIDDM subjects and six mild hypercholesterolemic subjects were treated with the powder of roots of W. somnifera for 30 days. Suitable parameters were studied in the blood and urine samples of the subjects along with dietary pattern before and at the end of treatment period. Decrease in blood glucose was comparable to that of an oral hypoglycemic drug. Significant increase in urine sodium, urine volume, significant decrease in serum cholesterol, triglycerides, LDL (low density lipoproteins) and VLDL (very low density lipoproteins) cholesterol were observed indicating that root of W. somnifera is a potential source of hypoglycemic, diuretic and hypocholesterolemic agents. Clinical observations revealed no adverse effects.
*Mormon theology and doctrine appears largely taken from other and older beliefs, and again is a another form of humanist religion, as we can see with the Freemasonry ideas.
Brooklyn, New York
5. I hate cooking. Loathe it. I tend to eat things in a whole state (cottage cheese out of the container, steamed veggies, plain fruit), but grudgingly cook spaghetti, stir-fry, lasagna, soup, and simple things like steak and burgers. My wonderful husband is my sous-chef and chops all the veggies for me.
This was another super quick card! These borders look SO real! On this one, I have heat embossed it in white and it really pops doing that!
Black Undershirt: Pink Orchid
Founder Jean Nidetch described herself in a 1971 biography as a "fat Brooklyn girl who grew up to be an even fatter Queens housewife." She graduated from high school in Bedford-Stuyvesant in the 1940s and worked for the Internal Revenue Service before marrying in 1947. By the 1950s, she found herself in the massive garden apartment complex Deepdale Gardens in northeast Queens raising two sons and developing a compulsive eating habit.
Wesfarmers and Woolworths are publicly-listed companies, so profits are important for their managers. While profits at these companies continue to grow, farmers continue to complain - on the back channel, in the background, if you like - that their incomes do not grow to match the cost of inputs and other expenses.
Today was a great day to hop in the car and go for a nice little drive. One of my Facebook followers made a mention to me of a wine shop in Stockton that I haven't visited in quite a while, so it was on my agenda for today. That said, I figured a seat at the bar at The Black Bass was the perfect place for lunch.
It was very tasty and I will definitely do it again the slow cooker and the added bonus it made the house smell delicious all day.
We ate there 3 times in 1 week, the last night between 4 of us we ate; 15 pork dumplings, 10 vegetarian dumplings, 2 pork bums, 6 spicy pork dumplings, 2 springs rolls, fried rice, gai lan, and spicy ground pork green beans.
One of the hallmarks of any discussion of power pop as a genre of music stumbles upon the definition of just what the hell power pop is. Some have chosen an appeal to authority, usually invoking Pete Townshend and early Who. Others have performed a bit of audio vivisection and determined The Beatles brought together all of the elements of the genre. Still others have followed an archaeological approach going back to the 50's tracing the rock and pop influences of artists like Buddy Holly. Further evolutionary thinkers eschew the neanderthal or cro-magnon predecessors in favor of the 1970's emergence of homo power popus, otherwise know as Badfinger, Big Star and The Raspberries. It turns out it is possible to trot out as many different definitions of power pop as there are people listening to it. Power pop, as such, turns out to be a little like obscenity; we cannot define it but we know it when we hear it.
It seems that those who live as Hindus in jat pronounce themselves as jaats and those who live in Punjab pronounce as jatts.
It is much easier for a predator to pull up a mini-skirt, then a long dress/skirt or pants (it does not mean that a predator will still not strike), but he must factor in what you are wearing, to how long it will take him to get you undressed properly*
Anyway, my plan was to get to Limerick, check into a hostel, maybe see a bit of the town, and leave first thing in the morning for the Cliffs of Moher. As I walked through Limerick, I picked up a distinctly gritty feel from the town nicknamed “Stab City.” The one hostel in town appeared to be in a run down industrial zone. It sort of reminded me of an Irish version of parts of Brooklyn. I could almost picture Irish hipsters flocking to Limerick lofts overlooking the River Shannon.
For I know in time
- Do not exercise with your legs straight if your trunk-thigh angle is open: forget scissors and cycling
While meditating I saw the living fossil of the toddler in me trying so hard to accomodate the expectations of others that she'd internalized those pressures habitually in order to protect herself from any devastating outside blows. In the water of the soul swim the creatures of truth. This is one I just became aware of, again. It's a slippery one and easily wriggles out of my awareness even when I try to hold onto it and study it's dynamism. Which I'd only do if I prevent it from getting buried in the valley of the avalanches of novelties, distractions, self-consciousness and habitual hurry scurry.
By the 1970s gospel music was at a crossroads. Rhythm and blues had moved into soul, and the old-timey feel of much of gospel was alienating younger audiences. It fought back by adapting the sounds of contemporary funk and soul to their songs of devotion, and in recent years these records have become some of the hottest items amongst collectors. However until now the Stax Organisation and its Gospel Truth
Peer Helpers are reminded that their research paper is due May 11th.
Denise Crant, 46, Hackensack, N.J.
This is Loudness!’
+ you have a dark complexion (shade range is absurdly small and caters to pale to medium skin tones)
The commissioner, who
Child 44 by Tom Rob Smith
One can, with hindsight, imagine a string of questions about the NotW’s investigative and financial practices which could have been asked and which would have made Mr Wight’s position far more clear.
We went out early this morning to see the sunrise over the bay. The morning was filled with sounds of birds waking and sights of the early fishermen on the bridge and in the bay. This is a wonderful way to start the day.
The PJ categorically denies the news published in the Spanish paper “Diario Sur”,
TIMING, is a HUGE part of being a good storyteller, thus it is naturally a large component of “voice.” Writers must have a natural sense of when things should be tense, versus the times we need to let the audience have a breather. Writing a novel is very akin to writing a symphony. If everything is crescendo, then nothing is. If every page is mind-numbing tension, then nothing is. Conversely, if our writing is just a character thinking, then thinking some more, then thinking some more, then that is not a story, it’s a diary. It’s the elevator music of story.
Anyway, I digress. Despite that disconcerting start, the cliche beast is kept on a mercifully short leash throughout. There is a bit midway where a (gasp!) girl at the table causes some predictable awkward lust and inter-group strife, but that's really about it. In fact, most of the cliches on display in GotY have more to do with gamers' stereotypes about each other rather than anything outsiders would recognize: John is the solid, man's man military enthusiast into 1970s chit wargames and kicking ass while taking names. Billy is the ADD-afflicted goofball loony who just wants to have fun. "Good" DM Richard's pompous foil Gary Elmore (tee hee!) is an archetypal all talk, no action frustrated novelist/thespian, more interested in telling his epic stories as floridly as possible than in getting any actual gaming done.
manufacturing. This translates to a faster return on investment.
Any generation could use a reminder to give more careful thought to the occasions in which they could advance the kingdom of God, but in a day like ours, the command couldn’t be any more urgent.
ICARDA. Aleppo, Syria. 2012
The interviewers’ questions were terrible. Her answers didn’t help. She portrayed Latinas in such a bad light. I have no idea who told her she was doing us any favors.
p.s. Wouldn't the pears be sweet for a 'Perfect Pair'-themed wedding?
What are Jolly Lollies?, you might ask. They are inspired by the work of this blogger, which came to my attention during a StumbleUpon session. I was curious, and obviously charmed. So I went to King Soopers, bought a bunch of Jolly Ranchers and some wooden skewers and set to work.
but It’s always a doom,
We wonder which CL Financial companies listed Sam Lord’s as an asset, how many separate times it was listed, and for how much. After all, we taxpayers are going to pick up the tab for this so we have a right to know.
That's it, three coats, not too painful after all...
"Millions?...Then what?"
Doc and Josh provided great banter about all of the beers tapped for the Takeover and once everyone sampled five, they continued to work their way through the rest of them! The stark similarities between the Moa range and wine production became clear with a lot of them being aged in wine barrels. Josh even mentioned that cellaring beer, although foreign, is what Moa hope to encourage to bring out the complexities and characteristics of their beers.
Tanya’s secret garden,
So when all of this was said and done, I sat back, proud of my vigorous organizational aptitude and realized, “the Mister has NO CLOTHES!” It’s amazing how men will cling to a pair of pleated khakis from 2002, with no intention of wearing them, and items like those (and the high school soccer t-shirt) will fill an entire closet!
The writing style was really cool. It switched between characters really well, and it was third person, but from different perspectives, if that makes any sense.
some might have seen me wearing the silver ring in the second photo.. it is my all time favorite, big sister to Paloma, called Mask of Gonda - also admirable work of Björn Weckström.
What's new and exciting for summer 2012?
These bring back more memories of being with my grandparents. My Aba would buy these ambades, and bring them back to us, wrapped in newspaper with coconut chutney enclosed in a banana leaf. Invariably, the chutney would leak out onto these ambades, and they would turn into a soggy mess... but what a absolutely tasty mess that was! In fact, when I grew up, and ate ambade that were freshly fried, I kind of missed the taste of those coconutty soggy ones :-) Even today the smell of frying fritters takes me right back to those hot sunny evenings in the village, sitting on the stone verandas, under the swaying coconut palms and greedily gobbling up these goodies, with not a care in the world.
With that dying thought being ‘What If?’
The field is open to almost anyone with a grievance to deliver their two cents' worth, even touching unrelated issues such as Page Three.
This Cross is located near the Resort we stayed in.
Belbury Poly – Chapel Perilous
Hello and welcome to my new follower :-) I'm almost there, one more and the giveaway for hitting 50 will be here!
Brettonian Pegasus knight
Hugs Dawn
The major talking point from the event was that of responsibility and the participants returned to this point time and again. We saw how easy it was for participants to interpret ‘responsibility’ in different manners. Taking responsibility, therefore, will be a challenge.
Linda: “I’m going to be the recorder of what happens.”
“There was a lot of talk about lucid dreaming and understanding reality. . . . And there were a lot of books and movies . . . things that I never would have heard about or watched — things like Loose Change about the 9/11 conspiracy.”
Apparently you need two people to come up during the ceremony and lasoo you. Padrinos, they are called. There is a great explanation here. I don’t know who that will be yet. Or maybe we don’t need to be quite so rigid in the tradition, and can have J’s parents do it, or our mothers.
Nominate fifteen blogs I enjoy and follow.
I wrote the following note to invite my guests to the Living Room Conversation which took place on December 4th. Now I’d like to invite both individuals and organizations to use the materials on our websiteto have a living room conversation and then tell us about it! We have so much to learn and together! This holiday season I’m dreaming of tens of thousands of Living Room Conversations happening across our nation next year.
"For fans of The Hunger Games"
The Nitty Gritty
*Additional notes: Patient will be traveling with his grandmother. The patient will be staying in the hospital with his grandmother for eight months. He will receive the first round of six injections in the first month. He will receive physical therapies, 6 days per week for the following 6 months. He will receive the second round of six injections in the eighth month.
back and back
Currently we’re still trying to figure out what day it is, only emerging from our cave to catch late showings of The Avengers (Catherine’s name’s in the credits!) and, a far less satisfying to watch than read, Hunger Games. With only one month left on our lease, almost all our summer preparations have been set with three WWOOF hosts confirmed, train tickets reserved and a tent purchased. Come June we’ll be hitting the rails for 8 weeks of campagne living, but until then we’ll be making the most of our final days in the city we’ve learned to call home.
I saw the stupid Rush Limbaugh story and rolled my eyes. Great job you assclown! Now no one is going to see the real issue. You gave a great gift to those who would violate the Catholic Church's freedoms.
Now I can display some vintage treasures on the shelf as well as have the perfect place to hang towels. I sewed a piece of seam binding to the edge of the towels to allow them to hang nicely.
She was impressed, "Oh! You're right, Mommy! I know what the best things are! We need to buy a horse, so I can ride on him." (This is her latest obsession.) "And after that, we can buy the best puppet." (Puppy.) "And then a kitty cat for our house, because it is the best. And then..."
I’m totally cool with the exercise. I lift weights, do cardio, do aerobics, etc. I think working out is the easiest thing in the world to do.
Boscoe does not seem to mind, much, this diminished state that he is in. He adapts. He cannot stand up easily, and so he has learned to rock, like a Minnesotan getting a stuck car out of a snowdrift. Out in the yard, he pees while walking, because if he pees while standing still he falls over. Right now the back yard is covered in hard gray ice, and so he falls over sometimes anyway, and often he just lies there and waits for one of us to rescue him, perhaps keeping a resigned, weathered eye out for vultures. We get behind him and put our hands under his feeble, bony hips, one hand on each side, and we pull sharply and for a second his back legs are dangling in air, useless, like the legs of a paralyzed person, but then we set him down and hold onto him for a few seconds and he's able to get his balance and walk.
But they're not putting themselves in the heroine's shoes. They're not aspiring to be the heroine.
I'm not saying everyone needs a bag of trail mix bigger than their head, but Costco does make it hard to resist. It's a salty snack the way God intended.
Sue Pieper Fabric! Even though my mother does professional seamstress work, & my paternal grandmother made her living as a seamstress, the genes from both sides seemed to skip right past me! I love everything about fabric & fiber arts, but still I'm "fabric impaired" and how to use it totally eludes me. Maybe in my next life----
‘Amy told me in sign language. She said “Remember the dead banana”’
Victory Braumeister Pils
05 ROTWANG'S PARTY (Giorgio Moroder) 5'38
Seven former residents of Kensington Palace served as the inspiration for the exhibition and included:
Here's one of my girls wearing her saddle. Looks more like one of my grandma's aprons! You can also see the size difference between her and The General.
Third, I have a DreamTrips Membership through World Ventures (this is a discount travel club that has saved me thousands of dollars on 5-star trips at 2-star prices) I get lots of great travel deals through them including a 10-day Western Caribbean Balcony Stateroom Cruise for $535 per person including port fees & taxes.
Chocolate brown is timeless.
"It's because the other teams can't stop looking at those damn pinstripes."
to go home with and spear her,
Based on our different approach to life, I sometimes wonder how my sister and I are from the same parents. But then we talk and I’m sure we are indeed related. She is smarter than me (and I’m no dummy), but I have way more street smarts than her. She is much more serious than me, but able to laugh at the most inane things like I can. And especially, she can laugh at herself, which is great because I was laughing at her all night long.
His creative musical works contain inspirational elements from a range of genres including hip-hop, classical do-wop and electronica. Curtians Don’t Talk was released earlier today as an exclusive free mp3 for Mixmag and it’s quality stuff! There’s also a neat interview where Daedelus ‘ quirky yet humble personality really shines.
While I enjoy good music, there is nothing sweeter than a memory stirred by a familiar scent. Pumpkin pie fresh from the oven, my husband’s cologne, baby lotion on a newborn, the frosty smell of Granny’s deep freeze that she kept in one of her barns. . .
This all fascinated me and I was even more interested in finding out who this related to my own behaviours. I wasn’t trying to be a South African in a foreign land, nor was I trying to be an Englishman. I just want to be objective about all facets of life. But how can one be objective when all your opinions are your own? (Confusion struck)
Our city is wonderful and made for more than shopping. We want to reclaim it for play and revolutionary fun….
Before I do, I have a little announcement. Halfway through this giveaway, I set a goal of reaching 150 followers. And if I reached that magical number, then I would also choose a "runner up" winner who would have the opportunity to receive one of the books presented in this giveaway. And with your help, I reached 154 followers! Thank you!
We ended up locking Rosa out of the bedroom last night. For whatever reason, she has been walking on us, we throw her off the bed, she hops back up in one minute, and we play the game all night - making it an unrestful night for all of us. I tried to play with her a little last night, gave her some cat nip..... but at 3:00am sometime she decided it was time to take a trek on her Moms! I think it doesn't help me getting up to pee so many times a night....so she thinks its time to play? If we lock one out, we have to lock the other out... so about 5am Clover is screaming to come in.....We never heard a peep from Rosa to come back in. We let Clover come back in..... she played in the room with whatever she could find and was fine until I got up about 7:30am.
“Yes, I do agreed that we need FT and FW. But there is always a limit to all things. Drink water is gd for health, too much will kill u too.” – evq
Stress has a major influence on the function of your immune system, which is why you’ve probably noticed you’re more likely to catch a cold or the flu when you’re under a lot of stress. This is true for both acute stressful episodes, such as preparing a big project for work, and chronic stress, such as relationship troubles or grief. Both will deteriorate your immune system and leave it less able to fight off infectious agents.
Because we don’t have an entry closet I simply added some hooks; baskets and a bench to increase our usable space. This is a trick I like to use as a previous professional organizer. My handy hubs helped me to create a coat rack out of spare wooden hangers we had laying around and some reclaimed wood. We love it. It now houses jackets, hats, and shoes for all of us, including our little man Oliver Tate. The stool was a retro flea market find that we simply recovered and it creates the perfect place to put down my purse. The basket, which is locally crafted, houses sticks and pinecones from our daily family walks.
Fun House
Amerika kan nie eers meer doen wat dit goed doen nie en dit is om weer 'n oorlog hier en 'n oorlog daar te begin nie - hulle het nie die kapitaal nie. Die hele Irak 'oorlog' - meer 'n verkragting - is op buitelandse skuld aangevat en loop al oor die 3 triljoen US dollar.
At the border, we got our passports stamped for exiting Peru, and then for entering Chile. We had our bags x-rayed once again, and the forgotten bag of orange peels was confiscated. We also lost two of the passengers from our car! I have no idea why they were detained, but the driver and the one remaining fellow passenger seemed to agree that it was silly (not sure if the passengers were silly, or the reason for their being detained was silly). We continued to Arica without them.
These questions are like a festive gift oriented version of “Do I look fat in these jeans?”. Regardless of their real answer, or how they feel about your gift, the answer will, in most cases, be a firm “I Love It”. They are already put enough on the spot by having you (and everyone else) watch their every facial expression. Honestly, is an added interrogation really necessary? So, don’t do that. In short, receiving presents is the trickiest, and that is when you are really in the hot seat.
Ladakh trekking is an amazing experience as the steep valleys and rivers at this destination brings out the best of your trekking skills. Trekking In Ladakh is not just an adventure but a journey of learning and understanding. You will get to explore several cultures, Ladakh lifestyle and cuisines. The learning experience is seriously amazing. The people thronging here in great numbers cherish memories of every second spent over here. Trekkers are tempted with peaks and Ladakh and Zanskar series. Spituk to Markha dale, Lamayuru Gompa to Chilling and Likir to Temisgam, Stok Kangri trek, Nubra Valley hike, Trans Zanskar ramble, Rupshu vale trail are some new additions to Ladakh trekking prospects.
The issue in her mind being that “rules are rules”, and wondering if they would be “setting a precedent” by allowing him to run without competing at Nationals.
In my non-humble opinion, President George W. Obama is breaking another promise (health care for every American was first) and, on the advice of Rush McCain “that we're in this thing to win,” is committing we, the people, to years more of human injury both physical and mental, human death, and billions more dollars that belong here at home.
Jaleel and Kym danced a kick-ass tango to "Satisfaction" that was lively and fun. Twist at the end with Kym slinging him down on the floor. The judges praised the performance but suggested some techniques to improve. Jaleel said that Jagger and George Jefferson have the same walk except that Jagger's has a cluck to it. They got 22.
The whites will then take over and rebuild this country, they will be fully in control, the few blacks that are left together with the whites will build a massively powerful state.
by C. Joos
One specific jewish anti-White libel/story in the larger jewish version of history. This is the jewish claim that on multiple occasions Europeans killed jews who were accused of kidnapping and killing European children for their blood. Since the idea that jews could be guilty of anything is unthinkable, the Europeans must be the ones who were, and still are, guilty.
Ring in the New Year by reaching moms across the nation!
If Van Damme would just high kick a barrel out of the sky, I'd leave a happy customer
It should be remembered that in many countries where Visteon operate, Governments of those countries have in the past given generous grants to assist in the setting up of factories and operations. Visteon have been happy enough to accept these monies but are now walking away whenever they can and without a thought for those employees whose jobs are now lost.
14. Lost - original schwindegger spitzbuam live in krumpa
3 Tablespoons Tomato paste
Senior Lecturer, University of Brighton
“Leave me be!” she hurled over her shoulder, and limped onward, but the shade kept pace, staying far enough back to follow without being seen.
20. It’s ok to glare at the ice covering the water bucket.
-1 tsp. dried oregano
You, on a bicycle, are not a motorized vehicle.
So what, exactly, is commercial? And, does one have to give up writing beautifully in order to achieve it?
These fears are usually connected with those that have greed and are terrified that they will miss out on something better if they commit to what is in front of them. These people are constantly searching and never satisfied. Self-destruction also plays into these fears as the illusion of ultimate freedom. Bids for power with these obstacles running the show are based on a false sense of power and mostly reactive rather than proactive. Any commitment possible behind these bids is tarnished by the ego and false personality and usually unsuccessful in the long run as it is not based in truth. If you are one of these people it is important that your bid for power and commitment has to do with something that truly has value for you internally and emotionally, and gives meaning to your life. Look to your relationships and to that which supports you unconditionally.
Yet drowning the passion that guides the soul
What about the Police Act that forbids an assembly of more than four people and forbids public speeches? Government supporters can attend public functions and can give speeches at these functions. Opposition supporters must first obtain a permit and, according to the permit, speeches are not allowed, even for dinner functions in a private hall. If anyone gets up onto the stage to deliver a speech then the police will step in and close the function down. The police will also confiscate the PA system and haul in the organisers and speakers for ‘interrogation’. The government supporters are not subjected to all this.
Sad thing is...since posting this on their wall on September 2, they've had zero suggestions. I guess when you only have 138 likes, you're not likely to get many suggestions.
Once again we get the report of another positive drug test. This time it’s Lashawn Merritt who according to his press release inadvertently used a product that contained DHEA. While it depresses me that, yet again, we have an individual testing positive in this sport it’s more depressing that this is a situation that clearly could have been avoided with a little knowledge.
Early in 1967, Bobbie made a demo which came to the attention of Capitol Records producer Kelly Gordon. He liked the songs immensely, especially one called Ode To Billie Joe. The song was around seven minutes long, and it's eerie, mossy, swamp-country atmosphere was unlike anything Gordon had heard before. With support from Capitol's number one producer David Axelrod, he was able to sign Bobbie. Her first single was one of the other songs on the demo, Mississippi Delta, but pretty quickly DJs picked up on the flip side.
Preheat oven to 375. Spray 8x8 glass baking dish with pan spray.
11 No Stranger to the Darkness 4:22
Lewis Schaffer -Facebook in Anger Andrew Head
Some of my favorite books have some of the best motives that truly drive the characters. And because I'm such a fanatic, I'm going for the obvious - HARRY POTTER. Never have I read such a series that showcases the motives of each character so well, yet intertwines them all together to create a seamless story. The motives of the protag and the antag are so deeply rooted in every action, in every word, in every expression. The readers feel the drive and can either empathize, sympathize, or antipathize with the characters and their journey to the story's eventual end.
Me: Do I!
Heat a skillet on medium heat and coat with cooking spray. Drop your pancakes into you pan and wait until you see bubbles start to form and then flip. Time will vary depending on how hot you pan is.
the help of Christopher White, a gorgeous photographer from work. All
Sign up at www.deadlinefilm.com for updates on the release and also you can watch the movie trailer!!
What is a hellrift? This is one of the largest problems with this query. Because the story takes place in a world that I know nothing about, I’m confused and disinclined to want to read more of this.
However, there is some bad news for the Coyotes, as their arch-nemesis Concordia-St. Paul University is playing fantastic. The Coyotes and the Concordia-St. Paul Golden Bears seem to be on a crash course heading towards the National Championship. The Golden Bears, the team that knocked CSUSB from the tournament each of the past three years, has been nothing short of spectacular as they did not lose a set in any of the three tournament matches they have played so far.
Que se aprende de las medialunas tomando mi tour? Como pedir, a que hora visitar para conseguir las mismas recién horneadas, cuanto dejar de propina y lo mas importante de todo... como conseguir unas de las mas ricas de la ciudad.
And what about his character? Obama is constantly blaming anything and
a handful of strawberries, a handful of blueberries with a touch of soya milk (instead of cream)
That's a shame, as Solsbury Hill's one of the few songs from 1977 that I'd call a classic.
- Each fight stick is individually numbered for authenticity
Speaking of Loki (Tom Hiddleston), he’s the perfect villain. As the banished demigod brother of Thor, Loki has some serious megalomaniac tendencies. He’s hell-bent on dominating the human race and genuinely derives pleasure from seeing others suffer. He relishes his hold on the Avengers, expertly using them against one another to get what he wants. Hiddleston brings razor-sharp wit and demand to the role, proving that he deserves recognition as an actor at the top of his game.
Place the broccoli florets on a sheet pan large enough to hold them in a single layer. Toss the garlic on the broccoli and drizzle with 5 tablespoons olive oil. Sprinkle with the salt and pepper. Roast for 20 to 25 minutes, until crisp-tender and the tips of some of the florets are browned. Remove broccoli from the oven and immediately toss with 1 1/2 tablespoons olive oil, the lemon zest, lemon juice, pine nuts, Parmesan, and basil. Serve hot and enjoy!
So I was thrilled to hear there was something I (and lots of other similarly frustrated moms) could do yesterday.
OR Email: flowershow@rhis.org
Not far from The Wenlock Arms, on the other side of the canal, is The Duke of Cambridge, or at least the pub named after him. It is a varied neighbourhood with a mix of refurbished Georgian houses in between more dreary block of flats. The Duke goes for an altogether more contemporary craze suitable for the politically correct Islingtonians- organic food and drinks. The emphasis is on food, but at least that means plenty of seating. And there is nothing wrong with being trendy if it implies a genuine commitment to quality. I did not try their food (which I regret), but the carefully selected beer list was a reliable enough witness: a solid range of ales from the Pitfield Brewery, including the first London organic draft bitter – ‘SB'’, brewed exclusively for the pub.
To illustrate:
You’re welcome!
Great Divide Brewing Company Yeti Imperial Stout
If you live in New York you should absolutely go to the Brooklyn Comics and Graphics Fest this Saturday and pick up a copy. I really wish I could go, but I'm stuck out here on the west coast.
This fall, every practicing Catholic must vote, and must vote their Catholic consciences, or by the following fall our Catholic schools, our Catholic hospitals, our Catholic Newman Centers, all our public ministries -- only excepting our church buildings – could easily be shut down. Because no Catholic institution, under any circumstance, can ever cooperate with the instrinsic evil of killing innocent human life in the womb.
Prepare eggplant; peel, slice and sprinkle with salt on both sides; allow to sit in colander for at least 30 minutes. Make 3 separate dishes for dredging. 1) Seasoned flour 2)Eggs & Milk whisked together 3) Panko Bread crumbs and Italian seasoning.
Host John Rich tapped rocker Sebastian Bach as the winner of the second season of CMT’s hit series, GONE COUNTRY, in tonight’s season finale. Bach is set to immediately release "Battle with the Bottle" to radio, the song he penned with Nashville songwriters Jeffrey Steele and Vicky McGehee while taping the series. The song is produced by John Rich. The accompanying video, directed by Wayne Isham, is currently available on CMT.com and will debut on CMT on Saturday, September 27.
Since that evidence was given, Mr Tom Crone, former legal manager for the NotW and Mr Colin Myler, former editor of the NotW, have issued a statement saying that James Murdoch had seen that email, in contradiction of his evidence to the Committee. Does James Murdoch’s answer cause him problems?
Wheat flour-11/2cup
And we arrived a half hour early. And there were 50 people in line. NAH NAH NAH NAH NAAAAAAAH NAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH! OK, I didn't say it. But, I wanted to.
Could mean any more?
I'm already stoked for next year's and definitely have to prepare more in advance. I threw on an outfit right at the last minute. I dug up this cape from American Apparel which really brought my whole modern day mrs. claus outfit together. added green tights, a santa hat and presto, I had my costume. oh and I wrapped myself around with some cheap tinsel decorations from cvs, which left an obvious trail around the bars we hopped at. whoops. I was so impressed with everyone's costumes I wish I took more photos but it definitely gave me some ideas for next year!
Hames, R. (1995). Yanomamö, Varying Adaptations of Foraging Horticulturalists, Just in Time Anthropology series, Prentice Hall and Simon & Schuster, supplemental readings for Ember and Ember's Anthropology, 8th edition.
They’ll show with you
Well, that is all for now!
“Arizona has the natural resources, the human capital and the legal structure to make this happen,” said Kris Mayes, Faculty Director of the College of Law’s Program on Law and Sustainability, housed in the Center for Law, Science & Innovation. “This conference is about making sure we advance the legal infrastructure in Arizona to create conditions that will allow us to really expand our solar energy capacity.”
The cover/remix song on the middle you will all love but for the life of me I can't put a name to it.
The Center for Spirituality & Healing (CSH) and the Tibetan American Foundation of Minnesota (TAFM) will co-host a special Twin Cities visit by His Holiness the 14th Dalai Lama on May 8, 2011. The theme of His Holiness’ visit, the first official trip to the state since 2001, will be “One Heart, One Mind, One Universe.” The Minnesota visit features three planned events:
An untried horse at 6am was saddle broke by noon
“Why is there a plastic sheet under the ground here?” Emily was the inquisitive type. “I never noticed that before.”
For more information and to purchase the book visit the High Line’s website, www.thehighline.org.
You should be in the garden every day. There’s always a job to do. But as I say: ‘Do a little. Leave a lot!’
blog post, you'll find her out and about indulging in her artistic
No one tried to stop me when I decided to stop taking medication. My parents had seen what it was doing to me and respected that I had my own idea of what would work for me.
November helped me break through to my 100th read this year. That is of course not counting the other plenitude of things I read such as short stories and even more graphic novels then I usually mention (I try to focus on graphic novels I think most highly of). A big help was my annual Thanksgiving break where 7 of these were finished. As we approach the end of the year I've been thinking about what other books to read for my year end list and I've definitely got a few thoughts. Anyway here are my brief thoughts on books read in November.
Considering that since the explosion in the sprints in Mexico City in 1968 (new WR's of 9.95, 19.83, and 43.86) the records in the 100 and 200 have dropped to 9.58 and 19.19, the 400 is well off the pace currently being set by the short sprinters!
Serves 6 to 8.
At this stage we develop a greater hunger for God and to be in good relationship with him. (note: this is not the first stage. The desire for God increases as we give up our own methods of coping, get honest, and listen. Don’t worry. It will come.) Then, when we let go of the stupid stuff we are hanging onto, which we thought would ease our pain and give us a sense of purpose and significance, like on the Hoarders TV show, he starts to come in and take the junk away. In its place he leaves more satisfying things, like love, joy, peace, patience, kindness, goodness, gentleness, meekness, and self-control. He equips us with gifts (tools) to fulfil our destiny.
7.ADAM & THE ANTS - Young Parisians
5. Free and fair access to media
Good evening everyone. Hope you have all had a good weekend.I have been wanting to join in with this challenge from the beginning, but moving house stopped all my good plans!!
Therefore … whatever your labors and aspirations,
I look forward to seeing your creations.
The action is in the second tier. These are the caucuses that begin after the polls close. Each precinct meets to choose delegates to the district convention, which meets to choose delegates to the state convention, which meets to choose delegates to the national convention, which chooses the candidate for president. It’s a month’s long process and much too slow for the media or most couch potatoes.
It's clear that, of the small number of authorities who are formally part of the network, all are at different stages of developing their ideas - and not all are necessarily developing the same ideas.
Google’s senior competition lawyer Julia Holtz said the internet Goliath was “confident” it did not break European competition law, BBC reported.
NO MONEY?
At night, before I sleep
The reason is because the original version is totally awesome! That is the first song Pigibit5 played together. Usuta Kyosuke is kind of my life-time mentor. I learned "Follow the guidelines not that you can show other people, but that you really want to do from your deep heart" from his pieces. I'd like to thank him with this album. He could listen to this album. Who would know?
Thanks so much for talking so much with me. Thanks to Delia, to Silvana, to Taddy, for being allies and for being so goddamned smart. Thanks to B for hosting for such a long time. If I make my way back somewhere, you'll be the first to know (so I should get your numbers. So we can text. Or something).
It’s a delight reading fellow dreamers thoughts, especially when pairings are involved. My senior once said that we can justify our own side, and it will always have a point. True enough. One can only be satisfied depending on their liking. I’m still consistent to my JinSung. I didn’t see any threats though I was preparing myself since ripgal mentioned that her heart of steel for JinSung kinda melted away. JB might have scored points in Week 5 BUT as long as Hae Sung is not giving in to him fully and as long as I haven’t seen Yoo Jin make his own move, I’m a JinSung shipper. Nothing’s final until it’s over.
Surely it can't be this hard to find an assorted box of card at a reasonable price and reasonable postage......or can it??
There are a few things I would say I obsess a little over more than the average person. I have an obsession with shoes (don't judge, you know you do to), I have an obsession with Jamba Juice (I literally have to ween myself off in the next two months because there isn't one where we're moving), I have a slight obsession with working out (in a healthy way, I promise) and I have an obsession with big, bold statement necklaces...mostly of the Anthropologie breed. I don't know what it is about Anthro and their chunky necklaces as of late, but I seriously cannot get enough! Case in point:
So I talked with the store manager. Then, having used up all my confidence, I ventured up to Thayer Street to visit the bookstores, eat sushi (while sitting on the green at Brown University), and drank something called "bubble tea" which had tapioca pearls in it.
In Los Angeles, California, protesters marched through LAX airport, encouraging employees to join the movement rather than go to work.
"Certainly not!" I reply indignantly.
And I still believe there is a big enough audience out there of readers who want a heroine they can look up to and admire. A strong woman who is the advocate in her own story.
How I never saw before
I just thought I would share a few songs and scriptures that help me in times like these in hopes that they may touch someone else as well.
Jetse de Vries - Transcendence Express *: You ever have that experience after finishing an anthology where you look at the table of contents, and there's one story that you know you must've read, but you have absolutely no memory of it? This is it.
Oops! I totally forgot I did have one other Easter project that I did on Saturday to share with you! In addition to the Waffles, I decided to make deviled eggs. But I did not want to make just any deviled eggs, I wanted to make them festive! Here is a little tutorial for ya!
FG=1.016@70F
and if they dig
"All poets are mad."
In these times of global warming and climate change, one is never prepared enough for the mighty forces of nature or in some cases, man-made disasters, such as the Fukushima Nuclear Plant or in Southern Philippines’ Cagayan de Oro flash flood tragedy caused by illegal logging. For those especially in vulnerable and hazard zones like Japan & Philippines, every one must be aware and be prepared.
After some moments she felt strong hands on her shoulders. ‘Come,’ David softly said, ‘we have to go.’
Phone: 347.274.0563
1)
I might have to take up drinking if this continues much longer.
One more time
(Words & music by roy
He had one last letter to write to a great granddaughter who probably didn’t even know that he still drew breath. The last of his living descendants, she would get everything he still owned. It wasn’t much. The house and what was in it, and the fifty acres or so of land that surrounded it. A thick sheaf of yellowing memoirs. He hoped that the little twenty years young girl would read them, and that she would understand and remember how an old fart had lived for far too long.
i've said it before and i'll say it again, y'all are absolutely the most delish folks i know!
I want to get a romantic meet like this story.
“This was just a regular traffic stop,” she said. “According to the language in the law, as I understand it, he had to have been (in) an accident or some unforeseen incident, possibly property damage or some type of emergency fee. And none of that occurred. He was just given a speeding ticket.”
The righteous are planted… plantings of the Lord (Isaiah 61:3). God wants you to flourish… to glorify the Lord…
When my dad, uncle and their mates joined there was a two-year waiting list and it would be three deep at the bar on a friday. Prospective members had to attend at least twice a month for those two years, and then present themselves to the committee to prove that you were of good character and had no criminal record (and presumably, not a woman). When I joined some eight years ago, there was no waiting list, and my exile Down South gave me special dispensation not to have to prove my worth in person. Fridays are very much quieter and the club no longer opens during the day. Times change. There's still an annual club trip - usually to Scarborough - though these days it's limited to veteran members and a crate of Landlord is no longer hoisted onto the coach.
The old reprobate looked at us and I think he growled, just before standing in front of the elevator door. He then raised his uncaned hand to push a button, but oh damnit, stopped, and looked again at us, who were smiling and being cheerful. He then looked back at both elevator buttons which just happened to be liberally smeared with pooh.
1 cup oats (quick-cooking or old-fashioned work equally well – I used old-fashioned)
slides total. Each brewery will have a title slide, so there will be over
This year’s focus areas are:
This is not really a horror film. That is not to say that it does not have it share of tension and scares but just that this film deals more with grief than with horror. Florence Cathcart (Rebecca Hall) is an author who is interested with investigating paranormal claims and is especially obsessed with busting fake mediums scamming members of the public. The film starts with her busting one group and having them all arrested because pulling these sorts of scams used to be illegal in Britain. This is in 1921 and it is only 3 years after the end of the First World War where Britain nearly lost an entire generation of young people to a war conducted by rich people sitting in map rooms. There is a lot of grief and desperation for these ghouls to feed on but the victim of the con is not happy about the bust. The fake mediums were selling the woman hope but Florence has nothing but cold hard reality to offer.
10.Cocoa......Chestnut.Hazel.........Long Neck
Ok, I think we have our starter group and I think everyone knows what to do. I even have an excel spreadsheet to track everyone. (oh, how accountanty of me) So, now it is time for you to post updates on your progress. Everyone seems to have a different weigh-in day..so, just try to update me once or twice a week and I will update your stats over on the side of the blog.
75 copies. In total. Ever. And all authors think they'll be the exception.
20-22
Cutler’s slyness continues to make him an interesting and dangerous character and given that Golda was pretty annoying, I am rather pleased that she didn’t make it out of the episode alive. I really hope though for the hype that they’ve been receiving all season that the Old Ones do genuinely live up to it and that Cutler’s plans towards Tom reach their fruition soon and that he interacts with Hal as well.
After my experiences at the tree and creek in the morning I was up for anything – sight, sound, revelation – anything. I was no longer surprised at what I would see nor would I ever be again. After a morning of flying with crows, swimming with fish, and standing in the middle of a tree trunk my mind was conditioned for accepting whatever would flash before my eyes.
In total we treated close to 200 patients. Dr Ntuli was awesome. The experience was great. It allowed me to serve with the gift that God has given me. It allowed me to grow in my faith. Would I do it again? ANYDAY! Should we do it again? The devil will have won the battle in the end if we don’t.
Design Mom is having a Love the Place You Live link up monthly to encourage folks to go out and explore where they live (rather than having to travel to some far or exotic destination). We have the added bonus of our local area being very exotic to us!
On the streets of New York, Austen found composure and beauty in common situations. More stunningly, she found it among lower class subjects -- bike messengers and street urchins, rag pickers and fishmongers. Most likely, she knew 'proper' New Yorkers would never have posed so spontaneously for her. Perhaps her choices were informed by contemporary New York photographers of the day, people like Lewis Hine and Jacob Riis, who chose the same subjects but for more social reformist purposes.
Indeed, federal law requires that unpaid trainees “not displace regular employees, but work under their close observation” and that the employer providing the training “derives no immediate advantage from the activities of the trainees.”
Stamps: Head Over Heels by Lily Bee Designs
As far as Windows 8 is concerned, it is possible to simply select either the “Refresh” or else “Reset” function in order to restore or repair a damaged operating system.
Girl, what should I do baby
It is Bonfire Night tonight and after watching a firework display we will be enjoying our usual bonfire with hot dogs, red wine and lots of other goodies in the back garden.
What would you do for yourself today?
Then it said my Wii age was 52.
My addiction starts again.
He followed me faithfully outside and I stormed down the alley, taking swings at street signs, brick walls and anything within arm’s length. In the back of my mind, I hoped that some drunken college kid or rambunctious thug would see me and start trouble so that I would have an excuse to release my rage on human flesh. Whether I won or not, it would have been a fight to the death, murder and suicide in the very same day.
Do I feel like I’ve made it? Not quite. Do I feel like I understand the topics better? I’m getting there. Do I feel a lot happier in my life? You betcha. And for that reason, I’ve decided to reaffirm my spirituality goal:
Update: This is a blog I started writing last year but I never got around to sharing it. This Christmas I have made another Panforte, I used the same basic recipe above. Here and there a few changes in fruit and nuts, a few toasted pine nuts and cocktail cherries. I substituted the alcohol for liquid from the maraschino cherries.
I have replicated below my request in full to Avon and Somerset Constabulary and their response so you can see that I’m not just making it up and it will probably appear on Avon and Somerset Constabulary’s website in due course.
"Is this a woman or a dog?"
“Everyone sees the unseen in proportion to the clarity of his heart, and that depends upon how much he has polished it. Whoever has polished it more sees more – more unseen forms become manifest to him.”- Rumi
TUSC is well placed to expose labour for its hypocrisy and outright lies that it defends ordinary people TUSC rejects all cuts whoever is making them but when labour makes the cuts people will see the true face of the labour party and will be looking for an alternative.
The contrast with what happened after the Haiti earthquake last January or Hurricane Katrina in 2005 could not be more stark. In both cases, there was an almost immediate descent into savagery, with police officers joining in the looting. In New Orleans, evacuation centers became nightmares of violence and lawlessness, and the National Guard had to carry weapons on relief missions. In Haiti, tent cities for the quake victims became scenes of mass rape.
Step 8: Sauce, cheese, wrap, label.
Oh.... again extremely excited!!!
Since the shows are now in full swing, I thought I’d share a few of the pics I snapped from our trip.
Most rooms and suites, at a generous 40m2, were created to serve the travel needs of the typically very large and close-knit Indonesian family with a proclivity to stay together in one room. These are accessed from a discrete set of elevators at the lobby level that begin the retreat from the excitement of the public areas. All rooms, including their glass-enclosed bathrooms, offer dramatic views of the mountainous perimeter, reinforcing the hotel’s resort ambiance. Like the public areas, the rooms are complete with refined furnishings and rich materials inspired by the Javanese aesthetic. Touches of rich timbers, Ikat woven fabrics and Batik-inspired carpets continue the tradition of glamorous travel with which Bandung is associated.
A newly revamped Experience line up that includes Dave Grohl on drums and John Paul Jones on bass headlines both Lollapalooza and The Horde Festival in back-to-back years. Jimi is declared by Spin magazine as the comeback musician of the year, with Neil Young coming in a close second. They record an album together under the name Secret Agent Man which includes a cover of The Ramones “Blitzkrieg Bop.” The album is a huge success on the alt rock charts, where is reaches #3. Many fans and critics are pleased that Jimi has moved back into the hard rock and guitar-based music that made him famous.
almost reaching out to pull you back.
The trial will test cells developed by Geron Corporation and the University of California, Irvine in patients with new spinal cord injuries.
Stripped of glory that I might be clothed
This imperative applies to anyone taking on the role of Director for a company but the principle, if properly translated into thinking and then action, could actually benefit society too.
3)To be open to him and to allow him to make mistakes and teach him to learn from them along the way
It’s a problem I’ve thought about when curating the names which appear on this site – are birth names somehow more valid, or better, than ‘self-appointed names’? Who am I to judge when a Metta World Peace comes along?
~ Weigh about 13 ish pounds... we find out Tuesday at your well baby check
What I have to say next may come as a shock to some: I have amicably parted ways with my agent. She's awesome. Keep querying her. You won't be sorry. That said, things just weren't working out for us. So, I'm back in the saddle, aka: querying game, again.
This is naturally a great honour; writers and illustrators love winning prizes. But I have two special reasons for being pleased about this one. Firstly, it comes from an organisation close to my heart. For six years I ran a campaign to support and promote School Library Services in the UK. So I am very happy that an award given by the SLA has gone to my work.
I have finished my third book, Ode to a Banker by Lindsey David, another Marcus Didius Falco mystery. It combines two occupations in the mystery, banking and publishing. A publisher who was also a banker has been murdered in his home and it is up to Falco to solve the murder. He is working this time with Helena’s brother Aelianus as his assistant. He is acting as a consultant to the vigiles who don’t have the man power available to work the case. Since Falco is himself an unpublished poet, the story brings Falco into the world of authors and publishers as well as bankers.
Fandom has always been so porous- and desperate for any meaningful creative input-- that it has allowed interesting people to sneak through once in a while.
Interested in entering the giveaway? Comment on this post and tell me: What is one of your most beloved books?
***SECRET*** Rinse grated potatoes, place in a kitchen towel folding up the sides and then ring out all the "juices".
Legislation that would give workers broad protection from the prying eyes of employers was introduced in both houses of the U.S. Congress on Wednesday. Both bills would make it illegal for employers to force workers or candidates to divulge social media passwords, similar to legislation nicknamed SNOPA, which was introduced last month. But the new Password Protection Act, sponsored by Sen. Richard Blumenthal, D-Conn.. goes even further, extending such limitations to smart phones, private email accounts, photo sharing sites and any personal information that resides on computers owned by the workers.
For some of you, this song will seem absolutely prehistoric -- for others, it will be a vivid childhood memory.
This is a recent journal I made that uses one of my oil paintings on canvas that I adhered to the panel, torn papers, beeswax and oil pastel. The intertwined fern image was created doing a polaroid transfer. And yes, that is why I call what I do "mixed media".
So, I’m a kayaker, and this open boat experience was interesting. Actually, it was thrilling. Guiltily, unexpectedly, I fell in love. I’ll write another post on what trying the new whitewater experience was like but for this one, just know that I am definitely going to be canoeing as much as possible in the future.
I also - admittedly - guessed that it would be part of the Guantanomo Bay bandwagon. Then I checked the website above. And guess what? Assad Baig's (or whatever his name is) ugly mug smiled back at me. Send him to Egypt or Syria - where he'll really be tortured!
Many of the Theta girls have enjoyed the opportunity to spend more time with their sisters while doing what many of them do best. There was a very large interest to participate from a majority of the house when Lip Sync was announced. A lot of the girls come from strong dance backgrounds and are eager to share their talents with their sisters.
At any rate, I'm still secure in knowing that I'm on the right (er, left) side and will continue to fight strong for my rights (er, lefts) to government entitlements and to overthrow the US Constitution by legal fiat. After all, I'm more American than anyone else now.
Hey, everyone. Happy hump day! I'm not sure where my mind has been, but this morning, it suddenly dawned on me that it is already Wednesday. I think I lost a day somewhere.
Questions? Ranting? Excuses? Drop them in a comment- I'll follow you up as best I can.
I also added a "Blogs I Read" tab. I am going to try my best to keep it updated because I am constantly added more blogs to my reading list.
One example is Anwar’s first sodomy trial, which started in 1999 and ended five years later in 2004, and even that duration was considered shortened thanks to former premier Dr Mahathir Mohamad’s resignation in 2003.
It's twisted logic, but it's spot on.
My brother left on Friday, but not before my Dad and Step-mom showed up from Tennessee for a weekend visit. Thank goodness they are all easy house guests or we'd be losing our minds by now!
I'm not sure how it's going to be when I'm actually put in a position as that - this is all conjecture at this point.
Mandy Slater – Internal Communication #4
What would you do if someone feeds your dog chocolate? Did you know that it can kill or seriously damage your dog? Come to our site to find answers to this and other pet poison issues and diseases:
Days like yesterday make it all worth it.
This past Friday was my brother's college rugby team's annual Alumni weekend, which I haven't missed in the past 9 or 10 years. It's always a blast, everyone comes back for the weekend and it's a great chance to see everyone who we used to party with every weekend. Re-live the glory days, if you will. Yes, I know I didn't play rugby, but those guys and their wives/girlfriends are some of my best friends, and I look forward to this weekend all year.
Regular readers of this blog will know by this point that my efforts to make sense of the shape of the emerging deindustrial future involve the occasional odd detour, and one of those is central to this week’s post. Mind you, those same regular readers may be wondering if the detour in question has to do with Ben Bernanke’s secret name as a Sith Lord, a point which occupied some space in comments on a recent Archdruid Report. (The best proposal so far, in case you’re wondering, was Darth Flation – think (in)Vader, (in)Sidious, etc.)
“Wow” we said “look at that rain!”
And, you know, I’m not a member of Occupy. I’ve never identified myself as a member of Occupy. I’m deeply supportive of the movement. But I think, like any writer or any intellectual, you know, one has to be critical. And I know that this has caused a great deal of dissension, because within the movement there is this noble idea that, you know, we can include everybody, it can be all-inclusive. But, in fact, in order for the movement to survive, it’s going to have to make some tough decisions about agreements, about nonviolence, about transparency, because the way that revolutions work is that you create paralysis within those pillars of authority.
When you’re a lady-gay or a lesbo, even in a major city, there is a very small pool to pick from. After a few years, you kind of know who everyone is. So, unless you start dating from state to state or internationally there’s some crisscrossing of lovers. I call it the lesbian-lazy-susan.
The original recipe (which I halved):
I think this beer is actually termed a fruit beer. It really doesn't have the hoppiness of regular pale ales and has a distinct apricot flavor. I first starting drinking this beer when I would visit Luke in Washington D.C. It always had a pretty fair price and is easy to down a few in a row. Magic Hat finally started showing up at my neighborhood grocery last summer and I have been able to grab a 6 pack every once and awhile.
Judd Corizan
Don’t tell me lies just say goodbye.
mouth. And then I was halved,
Copperfield Church
Beck’s for instance, brewed to the same recipe since the world was in black and white and offering a genuine authentic German lager at half the price of any other Reinheitsgebot pisswater being hawked. Carling as another instance. Take a lager and hone it carefully to suit British tastes by the loving addition of adjuncts, super chilling and fizz. The examples go on and on. Each example of cooking lager and lout represents a loving attention to detail in its design then applied to an efficient production process that allows the cooking lager enthusiast to neck a skin full for tuppence. Stella lovingly brewed with maize as an adjunct and often derided. Maize has been used to brew since the times of the Inca’s. Take this ancient tradition and fuse it with the European Pilsner lager tradition and you have an exciting fusion of Inca and European tradition, all for 50p a can.
I wish I shared her enthusiasm.
A mile later we are off the island and cruising across the bridge. The waters pass below us. They are calm and the moonlight is shimmering on the small waves, creating dapples of white in the crests. On the right is the ocean, on the left is the gulf; it is, in essence, the same water, but with two different names. I have the urge to cry, but I don’t. It’s not that
The boys start school today
I replied to tell him he was a fake.
take a box of white cake mix. prepare as directed on box. bake as cupcakes- makes 24. let cool completely.
The contrast was remarkable and magical. It's great to get out in the natural world!
Much Love. :¬)
his or her own authoritarian parents. In fact, the need to get rid of
Ellie.
They are the 'survivors'!
"With Point Made, legal writing expert Ross Guberman throws a life preserver to attorneys, who are under more pressure than ever to produce compelling prose. What is the strongest opening for a motion or brief? How to draft winning headings? How to tell a persuasive story when the record is dry and dense? The answers are "more science than art," says Guberman, who has analyzed stellar arguments by distinguished attorneys to develop step-by-step instructions for achieving the results you want.
Has blogging had an impact on your voice as a designer?
The holidays are always a rough time for me. Especially the last few years. Last year I lost a very good friend in January and the year before my mom was very sick over the holidays and ultimately passed on in March. But that is only a small part of what really bothers me about the holidays.
I know this, but I just can’t bring myself to actually do it. Maybe it’s burn out or maybe it’s the fact that I still have 2 weeks and back home I never started studying for exams earlier than the day before. Whatever it is, I need to snap out of this funk and get serious.
Buried in a small area south of Detroit Road, east of W25th and West of the River, access to the Tremont area is fairly limited. We took the W 25th Street exit off I 90, which turns into Wade Road, and turned left onto Scranton Road. I knew that I wanted to take a right turn onto Kenilworth to get into the Tremont neighborhood. On my left was a small orange construction sign that was half hidden behind a telephone pole. I read the words “Kenilworth Detour” and an arrow that pointed to the left. This did not make me happy. I knew that if I had to turn left for a detour either a) there would be no more signs telling me how to get into the Tremont neighborhood and I would be driving around randomly trying to figure it out and b) I would be driving into a pretty sketchy neighborhood. Luckily, as I reached Kenilworth, I discovered that only the sidewalk was closed, not the street.
Danada (Dan +Ada = Danada) is named for Dan and Ada Rice. It was their estate for horse breeding with stables and race track on the grounds. They raised champion Thoroughbred racehorses. Those horses raced in the Kentucky Derby. In 1965, their Thoroughbred named Lucky Debonair won the Kentucky Derby. In 1966, Advocate won the race, while another one of their horses placed second.
Bump Out The Kitchen
Beads on a String-America’s Racially Intertwined Biographical History never stops celebrating our heritages from the naming of the country by Martin Waldseemuller to the elimination of overt racial discrimination, through education, entertainment and to the glorious day of racial, political and social unification with Barack Obama’s Presidential election.
At this point in time, the U.S. has other priorities. Or should have.
Another Wednesday and another opportunity to go and see what Julia is up to on her work desk and then hop over to lots of other work spaces, all over the World, to see what everyone else is up to this week.
stop the chatter of what happened or what's to come
For those that don't know, today was Ladies Day at the Aintree Racecourse in Liverpool but it was a dress worn yesterday that really grabbed my attention. I adore the Roksanda Ilincic "Margot" dress and it was nice to finally see uber WAG Coleen Rooney, looking "pretty in pink" wearing the lantern dress accessorised beautifully with Louboutins I could only dream of being able to walk in and a black belt. That girl really does have a wardrobe to die for!
Websites
A COMMENTARY, CRITICAL AND EXPLANATORY, ON THE OLD AND NEW TESTAMENTS
first day of vacation and I am sick.
Tickets are available at venues listed on the flyer. Sure to be the best $10 you could spend that weekend. Hope to see you there!
PROS: hasn't lost a card game yet, owns lots of land, hasn't killed his horse yet.
Questions kept flowing in reminding me of how foolish I have been and how ill prepared I am to provide for myself and my children in times of an emergency despite current events and disasters that have devastated many.
If Your Baby Is In The Breech Position…
Their suggestions usually include getting ideas from watching television, or from books and newspapers, or from places they visit and so on. Generally someone will come up with the suggestion of getting ideas from dreams – and if they don’t - I’ll remind them that dreams – and nightmares are often a great source of inspiration.
A girl in one of my classes in graduate school once brought a binder to class that contained years of work she did on an outline for a novel. That’s right. Years. On an outline. She had diagrams and pictures and descriptions and character analyses. It was very intimidating.
“I said what I always say, which is that I personally think you should only tell a joke about any ethnic group if you can tell it to their face and they will laugh AND you can tell it when they’re not around and people who are not of that group will not find it offensive.
Yes....we eat healthy on station nights. But that's not the point. The decision of the day....tie up the microwave for an hour....6 x's 9 = an hour...or close enough.....or put them all in the oven for an hour. Either way....it's gonna take an hour....and they didn't get started until 7. Soooo.....they ate waffles.
That's what I mean... Living outside the previous box that
SKEERPOORT: Owners of Suerseba Café brutally assaulted and tied up. Ribs fractured and serious facial injuries.
arboretum/botanical garden
You and me are sacrificing our retirements, kids' educations, etc., to make good on bets we never agreed to, placed by parties who not only stood to lose little if the catastrophes they bought insurance against weren't paid, but who may actually have had the power to CAUSE the catastrophes they were buying insurance against.
How did you do on your April goals??
My favorite commercial on TV is not the black man with old spice who switches locations every few seconds. Its not the darth vader kid with the volkswagon magic or the ex-girlfriend guy on a ski lift who throws the cell phone off into the mountains.
One more thing to keep in mind is to bake this in cookie sheet. It'll help keep vegies separated from each other and cooked evenly. In deep baking dish, it will be mushy and take more time to cook.
Be sure to stop by our website and blog for more information (also if you'd like to oogle more beautiful wedding and event photos!)
You only have to walk into your local WH Smiths, Waterstones, Easons or Borders stores to see the real passion and patronage of the buying public to realise that they are doing all that can be expected of them. They browse, they buy, and they read. So where does that leave our distributors and publishers?
Perry was trying to kill me by becoming lodged in an area that I couldn’t get to. My only recourse (and not like I even really had a choice) was to begin the choking procedure. I wasn’t getting any air, and Perry felt like he had supersized himself as large as one of those Easter Peeps. I thought, “After all I’ve been through, and all of the effort I had made to make myself healthier, a gummi bear was going to be the thing that killed me!”
As more people requested readings, Cayce began to consider building a specialized hospital. However, during the process of looking for a partner, he learned a lesson that is valuable for all of us.
“You have no right to take what is not yours.” Aria said and unleashed her will with all her strength.
1 releasing
From our house on Vermont Street, we walked to Goat Hill Pizza and Farley's. There used to be a make-your-own teddy bear factory near the Anchor Steam brewery somewhere, and mine was a fat one named Farley. They only TV channel I was permitted to watch (on a black & white set with an antenna) was KQED, which I knew was where Sesame Street lived, a few blocks away at the bottom of the hill. But it was a big hill to a small girl, and the few short blocks seemed an enormous distance from the Slovenian Hall to McKinley Square.
Deep within the confines of my heart, there you lay. My soul is frantically waiting your arrival. The wind does little to sway my thoughts of you. As the earth bends it’s ear to my cries in the night, the waves of love caress my skin. Underneath my satin gown, your touch is felt, my flesh burns with each beat.
They are both myths, in a way. J.R.R. Tolkien created his own mythology in a secondary world he imbues with such reality that we believe it. Mario Puzo fictionalized and romanticized something from the real world. And they are both journeys, with unlikely protagonists who are forced into roles they never really wanted to assume.
"Good morning, baby," she said, reaching out to scratch behind his ears. Samson moved his head against her hand, arching in delight, encouraging more. He rolled to his back, and Sophie laughed.
Oh! Signs of life upstairs! I ought to be able to go get myself ready for the day!
What is your favorite thing to eat for breakfast?
As one of a minority of white people in the apartment complex I now live in, it suddenly seems so amazing that I didn't notice the whiteness, as I surely would now. But again, I was a child, and I did not question.And even though the facility has long been gone I can still recall vividly the lay of the land within its fenced off boundaries. Upon arrival following a two mile walk from our home a member would enter on the Champion Avenue side of it and show their ticket to an employee who sat at a window just inside the main entrance. Then proceeding directly to a changing room where street clothing would be placed in metal baskets and handed to a guy at a counter who would give you a coin shaped object with a number on it to track your property for retrieval at the end of the day.
Shared your dreams and shared your bed.
09. You Can't Always Get What You Want
age: 1-3
I was more excited about this movie than any other I can remember. The hype fed into it, and I enjoyed being a part of the blockbuster opening weekend, although I'm not always one to jump on the bandwagon or play into the hype. I wrote "when a movie becomes a phenomenon" summarizing my thoughts about my experience from the books to the movie, and highlighting why I think some people are so disappointed.
to the world - unleash your heart"
Here’s a great piece that describes the various methodologies for measuring attribution and the fact that most attempting to do such measurements are falling prey to common pitfalls. The piece, from eMarketer, makes the claim that first- and last-click attribution methods are least effective at measuring multichannel influence. It offers some handy charts describing stats on the most widely used methods, like this one:
Always Love You” sold more
“One-third of children from the ages of 6 to 19 are overweight or obese. These children could see their life expectancies shortened because of their vulnerability to diabetes, heart disease and cancer. Unfortunately, profit, not health, is the priority of the food service management companies, food processors and even elected officials. Until more parents demand reform of the school lunch system, children will continue to suffer.”
Another a" Must " Join Fabulous Giveaway open for all bloggers out there worldwide, this contest will run from June 28 - July 28, 2010, one lucky winner will have the chance to win this expensive bag the more entries the more chance of winning... so hurry!!! and grab the opportunity to win this designer's Bag for free who knows this might be yours...Let's support and spread the words of this Fabulous contest by "Moms Conversations.com and Win this $300 worth Brand new COACH Satchel Bag.
My first young readers novel (availbale as an eBook), Maras and the Fairy Rings came from my love of the natural world. Each autumn I gain pleasure from seeing the fairy rings (a form of fungus) 'flower' on our local fields. Wondering why they are called fairy rings I did a little research. From this emerged a modern fairy story featuring my main character Maras Mius (the name comes from the genus name for this type of fungus, Marasmius).
Hotflash out.
So, because I was wondering how much polish I really collected over the last few months, I made pics of my whole stash.
Then Ryan and I textured the ceiling and primed the room (Thanks for the ceiling texture how-to, You Tube!). Then we laid a wood floor (probably my favorite part of the room!).
Christian and I were lounging in his bed, talking about the trip we were planning next month to Cambodia. It was one of my favorite moments with him; watching him as his face become animated and his gestures get bigger and bigger.
He said about 5 000 councillors from all political parties from all over the country will qualify.
Some of the grandchildren were here for a couple of days this week. They came to help Grandma and Grandpa sort and pack and get ready for our move. I got in some much needed snuggle time and I loved having an excuse to use the fire pit and make s'mores and sing silly songs. Yesterday, baby Maesie slept in my arms while the family packed the car to return home. Three-year-old Kreed gave me a big hug and kiss goodbye. He started to walk out the door and since I still held Maesie, I asked if that meant I got to keep her at my house.
So if the food goes into your mouth but never adequately arrives at your cells; your cells are essentially starving.When the cells are inadequately fed they tell the body to lower its metabolic rate.
Oh shit, are you sure?
Casual Friday means Casual Friday. On those days when the dress code is relaxed, show the boss you know how to take direction! Wear your pajamas to work, or consider sporting your favorite leotard. And if you can combine several of the other tips into your casual attire such as a low cut, see through miniskirt; be ready to move into that corner office!
*Contact a Festival Organiser urgently about needing accommodation. And also a librarian.
Right now I’m working up a section of The Democracy of Objects that deals with temporalized structure. In my view, Luhmann’s Social Systems is one of the best kept secrets of the last twenty years of philosophy, and it’s a scandal that it’s not more widely read as it’s an embarrassment of riches. One of my aims in The Democracy of Objects is to show how object-oriented ontology can handle and integrate a number of dearly held insights from other theoretical orientations, while moving beyond some of their hegemonizing tendencies. Luhmann is very helpful here. Is Derridean deconstruction dear to your heart, Luhmann’s your man as he deals heavily with paradoxes of self-referentiality, temporality, and second order observation (check out his essay “Deconstruction as Second-Order Observation” in Theories of Distinction). Big fan of Lacanian psychoanalysis? Theories of autopoietic closure and structural coupling give you the ground ontology for understanding what Lacan is getting at.
Now, Munchkin is slightly younger than the rest of her class and she may be a little bit immature even for her age. Her birthday is in August so she started kindergarten when she was just barely 5 years old so most of her peers have all had at least a few months on her. When I look back on it, I always think I should have probably kept her in Montessori school for one more year before she started kindergarten, but that's just one more of those parenting decisions I can't change now.
That obviously cannot be the case. It must be some misunderstanding.
But the most special occurrence that any Astrologer could hope for, was this: two of the attendees in the class were born on the very same day! And, at this point in my career, I have two such cases to study! And in both, I’ve gotten to know the individuals before looking at their charts.
It went a bit better this time. I’m sure I’ll never use it again. I can’t even say, I’m glad to have added it to my repertoire, because I couldn’t possibly do it again without the book. But I am glad to have experienced it, especially if it is a pioneer moment in the evolution of the short-row heel.
era and nothing was ever wasted in our
But it's not all bad. The one thing I like about tax time is that it calls for going back through all my notebooks, where I keep mileages, expenses (you'd be amazed how many bars just aren't set up for receipts, and tips only get recorded if you do them on credit card, which I don't like to do: I was a bartender, and cash is better), and dates.
FAMILY VALUES: There is some comic violence, a bit of sexuality, a few bad words and a whole lot of smoking.
However, as a group they did not manage to convert that to the moon question. They all knew the rough distance to the moon (we’d used that number in a class a few weeks ago so they had a good idea), but they all still thought of a number in the thousands range.
"3,2,1...." he released the target "NOW follow the target...wait for it to hang...and hit it at 6'0'clock"
Which is about one mile less than a half marathon.
Yesterday was Easter….
So. For one broodjie, you need two slices of bread. Butter one side of each. Slice some cheddar cheese, lay that on an unbuttered side. Slice very thin slivers of onion, lay those on top of the cheese. Crack some pepper over. Cover with the other slice, keeping the buttered side on the outside. When you have four sandwiches you put them in wire grid, clamp it shut and toast over well-ashed coals until golden on the outside and molten on the inside.
My dad's auctioneer friend had an auction last week and I went a little nuts bidding. It was a wonderland of kitsch and craziness that I just couldn't resist! I won't even bother to sing the blues to you all about the great stuff I lost, because I managed to come away with enough goodness to make me quite the happy camper... It is all getting listed for sale of course (look for a post on that stuff this weekend!) except for this:
In her lap,
So, synaesthesia. You’d like me to talk a bit about it. Since it’s one of my favourite topics, I’d be delighted!
Sawyer and Kate: the SENSATIONAL
I just love that twine. I actually caused a bit of a stir in the house because I asked Jeff if I could buy it and when he heard with shipping it would cost around $20.00 he said no. But I decided it would make more sense to buy the twine than the same amount for wrapping paper, ribbon, and bows so I bought it anyway. When I told him he was only slightly upset and said I had to give him kisses to repay him. (Of course that was not a problem at all, I love to give my honey kisses.)
Total Fat 12.2 g
All of my Y.A. novels deal with strong themes but it is the characters that drive the plots, their highs and lows, their desires and wants and needs, how they interact with each other. I believe in creating complex layered characters, I think that humour is very important in books which have strong themes and ultimately if I have created convincing three dimensional characters, then my readers will want to turn the page and find out what is happening to them, no matter what they are mixed up in. I don’t write to drive home political or social messages, I write to create characters and situations and I am constantly making new discoveries about my characters and their tangled lives. This is the mystery and ultimately the pleasure of being a novelist.
As long as I'm on the subject, I'd like to mention some of the yerbas I've tried over the years. My overall favorite is the special blend variety of Rosamonte, which is a brand known for its particularly strong flavor. The special blend has a kind of velvety undertone that almost makes me think of dark chocolate. Another one that I've really liked is Taragui without stems, which has a richer flavor than the stemmed variety. There's a heartiness about it that reminds me a little of fresh baked bread. However, for some reason it seems that Taragui sometimes doesn't agree with my system too well, so I'm starting to shy away from the brand for a while. Most recently, I bought a bag of Amanda. I've only made one batch so far but my initial impression is that it tastes similar to Taragui but softer. It's a very easy one to drink, so I'm happy with it. I've definitely had some that I wasn't so crazy about. One in particular, which I can't remember the name of, was an organic brand that I got for free. I just remember it came in a white bag and tasted terrible, like someone had pulled weeds from their backyard and ground it into yerba.
Linking this to:
Grant, who is a life member of the Akron Railroad Club, writes in Twilight Rails that although a vast network of rails covered the nation by 1900, some still believed that the nation’s railroad network was far from complete.
WARNING: This post is going to be pic heavy.
On the heels of what is no doubt the best album of 2012 so far (“The Electric Age”), veteran thrash wizards Overkill have been hard at work in the studio working on the “Forget You” EP. Including the title track, which is a more socially palatable version of their classic hit “Fuck You”, we also get a disco version of the song “Good Night” from the latest album as well as live versions of the songs “Fear His Name”, “Black Line”, and “Undying”, not to mention a thrashed up cover of The Rutles “Let’s Be Natural”… The EP is slated for a July release. Rumors of Overkill making an appearance in the upcoming Die Hard movie have been angrily refuted by a former guitarist in the band directly to the Predator-In-Chief of Universe Number Five. We send him hugs and warm feelings.
Fresh parsley, chopped
Perhaps the most serious problem of South Africa's economic path and policies has been that of inadequate growth - and in recent years an absolute decline - in job opportunities in the formal sector of the economy. This is directly attributable to South Africa's efforts to be a 'global player' by pursuing capital intensive and labour saving economic and industrial policies. The question is how to resist this process and protect local industries and communities.
I had this "blank-slate" wall in my kitchen, next to the refrigerator, for which I had been keeping my eyes open for "just the right" thing to hang there.
Many transgender individuals choose to alter their external physical characteristics to conform to beliefs about “appropriate” appearance for the desired gender. Individual expressions of gender, as well as surgical, cosmetic, and medical procedures used to alter primary and secondary sex characteristics are signifier s of identity. Such alternations help individuals explore and clarify who they are and may help them gain entree to a community of others like themselves. Identity transformation is a social psychological process that develops with time, experiences, the management of emotions conscious efforts, and interaction with others
Boots - Clarks
From her voice, I didn't take that as modesty or humility, but a kind of vicious contempt. She hated her neighbors because they had more and she hated what she had because it was less. Her irrational envy spoke to mine and the two did not get along.
The parade has floats including over 50 krewes along with other local celebrities, charities, and organizations. They're all dressed as pirates, and all of them are throwing beads - think Mardi Gras, with a pirate twist.
I have been overwhelmed at the wonderful comments I have received and the number of new followers who have joined me over the past couple of weeks. Obviously the lure of some candy has bought some people over, but I can tell some people are truly here because they want to to be - with or without a give-away. So thank you everyone who has participated.
When I was a kid I used to love Saturday afternoons. Saturday afternoons meant The Incredible Hulk, The A Team and Wrestling. Now, there’s probably a vast difference between how you understand wrestling and how I do. Wrestling to me means good old fashioned Her Majesty’s British wrestling which roughly translates to overweight middle aged men who wouldn’t look out of place propping up the bar in the local pub wearing leotards and bashing into each other a bit. Our wrestlers looked like your uncle just before he went in for a heart bypass, they were the legends Big Daddy, Giant Haystacks, Mick McManus and big screen stars like Pat Roach and lovely Brian Glover and they were gods among men. They ruled Saturdays like majestic lycra clad warriors and Saturdays have never been the same without them.
If your prior diet wasn't so healthy, there's nothing wrong with slowly working your way over to foods with low glycemic index. Doing so will keep you from shocking your body. And if the change is so dramatic that you have problems, you are likely to not stick with it. You really need to do all you can to stack the deck in your favor. Foods with low glycemic index will make you feel better in a short period of time if you hang with it.
I also included Stevia as a sweetner. The leaves of the stevia plant have 30 to 45 times the sweetness of table sugar. You can find lots of white stevia powder in the grocery store, but only a few places carry the green powder. It's green because it's just ground-up stevia leaves. Two more interesting facts: 1. Stevia has been used to treat osteoporosis. 2. The Japanese use stevia to sweeten their Coke!
Janus Publishing wants the success and satisfaction of their authors to sell them as a publisher; that is admirable, but unfortunately a publisher has to do a little more than that, particularly if they are charging a fee to some of their authors. The bottom line is that while Janus Publishing seems open enough about what they say about publishing with them--it is how little is actually presented and the way it is presented. Perspective authors are going to be more interested in the 90% we do not find out about from Janus at first port of call. If Janus are one of the top author solutions companies with the best deals in England, and there own traditional trade imprint, full brick and mortar store distribution for their author’s books, then they should be shouting it from the rooftops. The fact that they are not is...well…as I said earlier…baffling.
Everything from the planning, to the antique and fabric shopping, to implementing the design of the tablescape was such a fun and exhilarating project. I particularly loved the styling and setup phase. Matching fabric swatches, gathering a little of each others dinnerware and stemware, to picking out the perfect amount of gold accents was more than a designers dream!
All of this is presented through reflections on the self-critical nature of postmodern thinking. We are not allowed to simply exist in Sone’s landscape, being shaped by it or allowed to be present in its confines. The landscape is never at any moment something other than contrived. Sone’s installation is a sculpture in the expanded field; we walk around in it, we are part of a situation and environment instead of being placed before it like in a photograph or a in a painting. We are constantly confronted with sculptures, drawings, and paintings of vastly ranging quality that give the installation a hand worked, constructed nature. In this respect, it takes on the feel of being temporary. Nature, to Sone, is a world shaped, enhanced, and twisted according how society has designed itself to view it.
Freeman’s improvisations take you quickly from one room to the next. Some of them, like the meowing slurs during an unaccompanied solo on the ballad “Body and Soul,” are breathtakingly strange. Others, like the wild chorus at the top of his range on Duke Ellington’s “Caravan,” offer hair-raising adventure.
Happy, happy, happy birthday to you Sybil dear! I know you will be missing your mother this year and for many birthdays to come, but I know she would want you to be as happy as you look in this photo!
The man responsible for organising next year's World Cup in South Africa has become used to answering questions about whether everything will be ready. Standing outside Soccer City, the enormous new stadium in Soweto built to resemble a brown African cooking pot, Danny Jordaan, a slightly portly man in a black blazer, reels off practised lines about stadiums, transport and crime.
I decided on following the trigger as shown ans sticking with the same color scheme. I love how it tuned out- I'm not usually one for sentiment-less cards, but I may try it more often!
Hey, has anyone noticed the movable ski school statues?? At one point they were clustered at six fingers and then they were moved to the knoll at the bottom of Racer’s and then out in the middle of Kennedy. They must be pretty light to be able to be moved around like that. No, on second thought they must be pretty heavy because it takes so long to move them from place to place. And speaking of ski school- I watched the most interesting clinic group on Racer’s yesterday (I forgot to mention in yesterdays report). It seems some in the group were practicing stem christies (not PSIA approved), some were practicing skidding their turns and a couple were balancing their arms. Very interesting and I’ll try to find out what was really going on during summer break.
3 April 1942: Secret Field Police Staff Commissariat liquidates the Russian Simeon Jssajev on suspicion of having been a member of the destruction battalion and for unauthorized wandering around.
There is another benefit of the old system that is as important as fighting well in the face of the enemy. When my grandfather returned from the horrors of the First World War, there were no combat stress charities to help ease the scars of what he had seen. Therapy was delivered by the regiment: neighbours and family, folk who had been there. Right up to the modern day, this benefit has been of huge value to those lucky enough to be in one of these regiments. Even today, the wives of the Argyll and Sutherland Highlanders who live in Canterbury (and some wits describe it as being 320 miles behind enemy lines) rely on other Army wives when they arrive to settle in. An effective, volunteer – and free – welfare service that works. It’s a rare thing.
― Friedrich Nietzsche
Sang soulfully, softly, with no trace of satire
You might be forgiven for thinking this was Kraytwins@blogspot or the lesser known film, The Godmother, but it is only the sons and me getting into the festive mood before a party.
Brian Thomas Cummins, 38, Manasquan, N.J.
I can say though, that I do have better days now. Not so many bad. Surviving has become second nature. In the beginning, it was an everyday struggle. Now it's a kind of new normal. Although the sting doesn't hurt as much, the hole doesn't seem quite as hollow, and the black hole seems to have started to form a bottom.. there are days where the black hole bottoms out and the light disappears. I suspect it will always be like this forever and ever. That's something that I can't seem to wrap my whole brain around. As of now, I have gone 7 months and 2 days without her. I have made it to this point when I didn't even think I would make it through a single hour, day or week. So to keep going.. well it should just get easier right? That's what I hope for. And for the most part it is more bearable. But it's the quiet moments that it becomes difficult. It's the moments of stillness and empty that I miss her most. The times when I come home to an empty home and clean floors. The holidays don't seem to bother me as much. It's the smaller stuff I miss. It's the small stuff that matters.
kick some ass
Even though we all use symbols everyday, and especially the pentacle/pentagram, there are deeper significant meanings behind many of them. I hope that you learned something new that will enhance your practice of magick in everyday life!
Le bon Marche
Mike Gordon and Ryan Mallen - Thanks for running the grill! If it weren't for your manly grill skills, we wouldn't have gotten our hot dog fix!
For those who have never heard of cake pops, basically you take a baked cake and make it into crumbs. Then you mix in frosting. You make little balls, insert a lollipop stick and then dip in melted candy melts or chocolate. It's not complicated but there is a lot of waiting time because you have to keep putting them in the fridge to get cold. If they are too warm they won't hold on to the stick and will fall off.
Der were guys dat ran at udder guys
Search- You can search for words or phrases in a single transcript or across multiple depositions, hearing or trial transcripts. This feature is nice when you are trying to remember a word or idea but can’t remember where it was.
Yarrow should be harvested while the herb is in flower, on a dry day after the morning dew has evaporated. The leaves, stems, and blossoms are all used medicinally. The leaves should be cut from the stems and spread out on a paper-lined tray to dry in a bright, airy room, out of direct sunlight.
Sizzix Decorative Strip - Join in the Cheer. NEW $14.00
It all just screamed of being above them all, being superior, which is a shame, since she essentially paints every actor and talent there with the same brush, ignoring people like Corey Monteith of Glee, who’s come from a life of juvenile delinquency and dropping out of school to stardom (he’s extremely humble and funny).
It seems to me that we have for the first time ever in history a statement from a quasi-governmental body which backs the idea that schools should do something concrete about reading for pleasure. It supports those thousands of schools which already do things, it gives a rationale or justification for schools to work at this, it would ask of schools which haven't thought much about this to do some work on it.
You told me to keep fightin'
Finally out of the psych ward, Amy joins forces with J.C. to find the killer before he closes in on them. Can their growing attraction withstand the truths they uncover?
An’ the fat man his mittened fist he shook.
The wonderful hostess for this swap, Kat Sloma, mailed me one of her postcards which I wanted to share with you. Kat is a professional photographer who recently returned from two years in Italy. She offers classes on photography for those interested.
She wore it all day.
But when I’m not teaching, I tend to look for other ways to express my creativity. Rooftop Fibers was born out of my recently discovered passion for jewelry-making, but I also enjoy writing, drawing, knitting, and sewing, among many other things.
Nor feel the wild flowers blow, nor birds dart by
Anyway, that's how posts like this happen.
Do you remember that lovely vintage linen haul that I bought a few months back? I wrote about it here. Well apart from including a few pieces in my patchwork cushions, I haven't really found the right project to show off the range and beauty of the antique embroidery. But I thought cathedral window could work really well.
1) part of their particular personality, which counters what I just said. ;-) But for some few children, it's just how they were born and not something the parents did (other than supply the genes ;-) It's not transferable through authoritarian parenting! (Some of us whole people are easy going and may even like others to make decisions. But that's not the same as liking someone else to assume control.)
My loud noisy cousins, my bro Richie, my friends (and enemies haha)
Random.org is used to pick the winner.
There are many ups and downs, and we even get to meet Victorian's father. You'll probably enjoy Riley's new powers though. That is when the story started to get more interesting. She can now see something that happened in someone's life just by touching them.
The only reason to make those polite requests is to preserve moral high ground for later. Basically: Do it so that you can say you did. You will need to be able to say that later for when every adult who promised to have your back inevitably betrays your trust, because your only weapon against them is your ability to destroy their credibility. Talk to them first to set up the shot.
Even more strikingly, no American constitution, state or federal, allowed dispensation, let alone its delegation. Nor should this be a surprise. The power to dispense with the laws had no place in a constitution that divided the active power of government into executive and legislative powers. The dispensing power was not a power to make laws, nor even a power to repeal laws, but rather a power to relieve individuals of their obligation under a law that remained in effect. It thus was a power exercised not through and under the law, but above it.
Seal, label, and freeze (actually, I find it works better to label the bags before filling)
And now that the holidays are over, I'm back at it, making more things. My training pants seem to be a hit--as a couple of people have requested custom orders--and any time I put knit play food up for sale, it never lasts longer than a week (too bad it takes so long to make them!) I'm needing a new foot on my sewing machine before I go back to making cloth diapers so you can expect them again as soon as I get that.
noise and ant jamming capability , with fast and accurate data transmission,
In the commercial insurance business, we are always looking for ways to get in front of business owners. And, where do business owners hang out? LinkedIn, Youngentrepreneur.com, and the like. Our goal should be to ‘meet’ these business owners online, become an expert in their eyes and, eventually, bring them on as clients. But, while the sites I mentioned are great starting points for doing just that, I think we should also do our research and find a few small business minded blogs where business owners come to learn about different aspects of running a successful business. And what is one of the main things they should learn about (in my opinion, anyway)? That’s right! Insurance!
Xu Guan moved quickly, grabbing up the shotgun and stuffing his pockets full of shells. He wriggled back out of his hole and replaced the barrel. Once the barrel was back in place, he climbed on top of its neighbor and then onto the roof of the building. As he approached the roof’s peak, he flattened himself and peered over. As he had guessed, four men with what appeared to be military uniforms and military rifles were moving in the direction of the building. The lead man’s head was down as he scanned the earth.
Honestly, I am absolutely hopeless at the moment.
Check it out. And leave me any links to recipes you love too! I love to share ideas!
New Albany, Mississippi, USA
In Christ
Combine all of your dry ingredients. Cut in the Crisco until it is broken into small pieces. Add the milk. The dough will be pretty sticky.
Yikes! I just took some finished pics of the closet and didn't realize that the littlest one took this pic while I was working on the closet. You can see how much stuff was crammed in there! That grey tote full of shoes, the short box next to the dog - shoes. The big box behind the dog had shoes too. Hmm, thought there was only one box and one tote of shoes... guess I did more than I thought I did. Oh - and pretty much everything you see here was IN the closet. And excuse me in the middle of the pic. Not the most flattering pic of me ever, but the Boo child was just tryin' to keep it real, I suppose.
They found that it led into the Chamber of Commerce, a series of connecting stone passages and rooms that ran under the entire city of Waterport.
A stranger? What means “stranger”, anyway?
1/2 c. butter,melted
First, the commentary, then the background, I guess.
The two systems are essentially electronic book/console hybrids for younger kids. The cartridges are the books, you plug the system to the TV and as you turn the pages, what’s on the current pages appear on the TV for you to interact with. Just watch the video for an example. XD
would British Intelligence shoot their own foot in an
Not so much.
He feels every emotion,
So the details...we arrived in Indianapolis a little after 5:00pm. We checked into the hotel (who wouldn't guarantee us a late check out....grrrr) and headed over to the expo. It was easy to find and was in a nice, open exhibit hall in the convention center. There were no bottlenecks anywhere and you didn't have to follow a specific path to get to the packet pick up area! What a genius idea! We picked up our packets and then did some shopping. There were too many good vendors to choose from! I had been wanting to get a pair of recovery socks, so when I found a pair of Zensah calf/shin compression sleeves, I went ahead and got those. I typically don't like anything touching my toes after long runs, so the sleeves are perfect. I used them post-race and my legs feel great today! After the expo we had dinner at the Spaghetti Factory and called it a night. I had a whole king-sized bed to myself. I was in heaven....but just a tad bit lonely. I had to leave my hubby and kids at home for this race due to my son's T-ball pictures and game coinciding with the race. Bummer! Despite having a bed to myself and no kids to wake me up, I still didn't sleep well. Figures.
In a second clip from the same event posted online, Sherrod appeared to urge black job seekers to find work at the Department of Agriculture because the federal government won't lay people off.
Add in seasonings, mix well and simmer for 2 mins.
He accused opposition leaders of organising a "campaign of lies" against him in order to weaken the Georgian state.
Emily's search to find Hope uncovered the dark underworld of stolen dogs. They auction dogs like cattle. Emily had known about puppy mills, where dogs were kept in criminally abhorrent conditions and literally bred to death, but only as a distant, shameful concept.
It would appear the proposed legislation is heavy-handed and there are far more important matters to address.
When you walk in the front door, you can look straight ahead to the dining area, to the right the small hallway where you have the main bathroom on the left, the craft room first door on the right, and storage room which is at the end of that hall.
The first fellow revealed that he was the parish priest.
–be in as many guilds as you want. You pick which to “represent”. Representation means you see that guild’s chat, and that guild gets guild rewards based on your actions.
‘Anywhere but here’ has become my motto.
1pm- chicken salad w/ olive oil and balsamic
Daniel-San (I) w/Mrs. Miyagi vs. PCW Champion Yamamoto Tanaka (D)
Combining two bad ideas — universal desks and regional desks — produces bad results. Certainly the copy editors and designers could produce cleaner sections, but mistakes are bound to happen when you’re putting out multiple newspapers every night.
We are now looking for some of you wonderful talented crafters out there to join our friendly design team. Just add DT after your name on your entry or email me directly (juliebjenner@btinternet.com) and we will announce our new design team members on our next challenge, don't be shy show us how talented you all are!
Obviously, I can’t speak on the actual definition from Flux, but for the purposes of the blog post: Just what does this mean?
At home, I learned how to make toad in the hole via live instructional video, straight from Pittsburgh to my kitchen. It swiftly fell to pieces in the pan, but tasted the same. I tried to watch the Oscars because my wonder-roommate, said “Oh you shouuuld,” in her same breathy and compelling voice. It worked, for a little while, until I stopped wanting to watch people congratulating themselves. Everyone is as sensational as they want to be. My roommate later agreed.
Thanks again for checking in with the family. Mama is less on a cleaning/organizing kick now that I'm in my new room. Both her and daddy (Gizmo and I too) are happier that we've been able to play outside. Check back soon for more Stoeber Family Happenings!
On the way to the gym I heard this song and I got really amped to work out. It really just makes me wanna dance and twist and shake and shimmy. Please tell me that you clicked on the link. And that as soon as the music played, you started bobbing your head or rocking your shoulders back and forth. Admit it. Because that’s what I’m doing. RIGHT NOW. Of course I’m playing it on repeat until I finish this post.
My week and a half break from posting has been refreshing and also very busy. After days filled with intense cleaning, cooking, sewing, fence painting, piano lessons, and then, of course, all of the activity of the Resurrection weekend, I am enjoying my first day of chill time and I intend to use it to the fullest advantage by doing absolutely nothing aside from the normal daily duties. The fact is, I'm not quite sure what to do with myself since I don't have a to-do list staring me in the face and telling me what to do!
And Malema is not alone. As we report this week, there is widespread support for him in the ANC among those who believe that their desire for Zuma to become South Africa's next president is far more important than the Constitution and its values.
Jamie grunts and I scowl at him.
Argentinians also have a great sense of style. Think Italian, but less gaudy with not as many layers, necklaces, rings and other paraphernalia. If I were to describe it in one word, it would be “classy”. It’s not bombastic and loud like the bikini clad bombshells of Brazil (which are also incredibly gorgeous) nor is it the girl-next-door look of jeans and T-shirts worn by Californian girls. It’s modern, clean and doesn’t overwhelm the woman but rather compliments her. Porteño women take pride in their looks and the results speak for themselves. For me, it was like a breath of fresh air after Peru and Bolivia where fashion remained true to their Andean roots.
It is September in Acadiana. We have waited for September for four months. It is the first month with an R in it since April.
In the months that followed, efforts organized by the Fellowship of Presbyterians, a conservative group within PC(USA), led to the creation of a new reformed church body known as the Evangelical Covenant Order of Presbyterians (ECO).
with not a drop of rain predicted.
This morning, I decided against getting a trailer for my bike. Instead, I put a heavy bag on the handlebar to more evenly distribute the weight. Something about lugging a trailer around is very unappealing. Plus, it’s not uncommon for my tires to come inches from going off the road. Adding a trailer would surely cause a few wipeouts off the sides of roads. After getting the right tools, and learning how to replace spokes, I feel much more prepared. If I break another spoke, I can handle it…temporarily.
It just goes on,
And back to the subject of the truly uninsured, the CDC came out with a report which found that (again, brace yourself for the shock) being unemployed makes you about 3 times as likely to be uninsured.
3) Bake the squash until the outside is beginning to brown, and hull gets mushy. This usually took about 45 minutes or so for me (90 minutes for me - Kris), and I'd flip the squash once or twice during the process. Depending on the thickness of the shell and the size of the bugger, it may take more or less time. I'd start keeping an intermittent eye on it after about 30 minutes.
The comfort I carry with me is the real ones are there should I need them to feature in my life – in the real world Cuthbert rarely gets a day off and even if he does Pugh and Pugh and Barney McGrew and Dibble and Grub and if necessary even Captain Flack are more than willing and capable of stepping up to the mark.
Yield: 4 serving
This is the story that I want to unearth. My aim is to bring Socrates down to earth, so to understand him, as he was, as an innovative thinker at war with his society and time.
Oh send and be the love
Added apologies to all you people living in countries which can't access Spotify. I haven't done this to deliberately exclude you from the Festive fun, but it's the only easy way of making all these tunes generally available.
I met some kindred spirits who will be friends for a long time I think. It was great to meet people who have the same interests as me but a totally different experience and facet of their life. Now I am working on the first aspects of a novel, a variety of stories, and continue writing two to three times a week on this blog.
Life has been really "full" lately. I guess "full" sounds better to me than "busy". Everyone is busy. There doesn't seem to be much down time, but I know that it won't last forever. Life is full, but there always seems to be room for a tiny bit more.
5. Thunder And Lightning (Ballard) 6:21
Brown Marmorated Stink Bug
I stumbled on a blog where I saw them being used for samosas. So if that works why wont pani-puris ?. With a health-conscious husband at home, I can have a healthy and yummy chat-dish within minutes ( especially with the meetha-chutney part taken care of).
A few days ago, a poet in Colorado Springs said to me, “I’m really not interested in theory. There is far more that is real in art. I like keeping my work close to life itself.”
It was fun before,
Post-script: Fun thought for people like me who know entirely too much about pop culture: John Carter when he is transported to Mars has exceptional strength and jumping capabilities due to the fact that Mars has lower gravity than Earth. The book Princess of Mars was written in 1917. Jerry Siegel and Joe Shuster wrote their first Superman comic book in 1932. Part of the reason that Superman is so powerful on Earth is that his body is designed for life on Krypton and the difference in gravity, the type of sun and whatnot results in him being, well, super. Both Siegel and Shuster were avid science fiction fans, so odds are very high that they had read Princess of Mars. Given that they did obviously borrow from other sources when they wrote Superman (even the name is derived from Ubermensch, a term used by Nietzche), it’s not that crazy to think that the book Princess of Mars and this story contributed at least a little bit to the creation of Superman.
Nor did Chet's silence during Respondent's decades-long use of KRAUSE PUBLICATIONS estop him from challenging its registration. Chet brought the cancellation proceeding within six months after issuance of the registration, a delay that cannot be considered unreasonable.
All I remember about it was Gregory Peck and the way people moved
An Englishman... perhaps more refined, reserved, rounded, romantic and blessed with a unique and wicked sense of humour as opposed to being pompous, pampered, proud and priggish.
That said... I sincerely hope that ANYONE who is against these bills will vote against EVERY SINGLE senator and representative who voiced support for and/or put their names to these atrocities. You can as cute as you want with your blogs and website today, but it means nothing if you don't follow through the next time these assholes are put for re-election.
- SU papers from the Pocketful of Posies pack
Project Manager Responsibilities:
Monika
- Eucalyptus and native rauli parquet floors of a house of the 70´s by Larraín, Swinburn and Covarrubias, which became the main coating.
A) The fact that I was so goody-goody in high school. The friends (and husband) I have now had far crazier high school experiences. I didn't know what marijuana WAS in high school. I wore sweater sets and tasteful footwear. I had a lot of friends in high school -- but -- living in Austin, I often feel compelled to lie and say, "oh yeah, I was a total rebel in high school! Totally! Always sneaking out of class!" Friends, I would have rather died than missed class.
Love doesn’t need this yellowed sodium lamp
The call for the 2012 round of funding is now open. For more information or to apply please click here
Swinging. You have to really be adventurous to get into sharing yourselves sexually with other couples! That sense of adventure is probably what fuels your spouse’s curiosity in the matter. I’ve never known anybody who has participated in this type of thing (and admitted it,) but apparently there are networks of people who host swinging parties that people can tap into. That’s probably safer than asking your friends if they’ll join you in your bed…
8. Act IV: You don't need a witness
Microsoft won a small victory when the International Trade Commission ruled Motorola had indeed violated one of the nine patents they were accused of breaching. Microsoft’s David Howard, deputy general counsel had this to say about the ruling “We are pleased with the ITC’s initial determination finding Motorola violated four claims of a Microsoft patent.”
* My family thinks I'm blonde. I definitely have lots of blonde moments.
This either/or choice was forced on us when religion failed to deliver on its promises. But spirituality, the deeper source of religion, hasn’t failed and is ready to meet science face-to-face, offering answers consistent with the most advanced scientific theories. Human consciousness created science, which ironically is now moving to exclude consciousness, its very creator! Surely this would leave us with worse than an orphaned and shrunken science—we’d inhabit an impoverished world.
LONG CRENDON 4 (C Scott 17 R Scott 51 Duke 61 75p)
Now on to the card. We'll keep it short and sweet. I used the sweet shack paper stack from dcwv. Cut it at 4.25 x 5.75. Use coordinating cardstock accordingly. Typed sentiment says "you're going to make a 'dino-mite' big sister." Cut dino's at 3.75" and another one at 2.75." I added a bow to the baby for fun and painted their toes with black smooch.
BrewDog say they are against "bland, soulless, industrially produced beers". This coming from the brewery who produce 660,000 gallons of beer a year and are currently raising capital by way of a share offer to move to a new larger brewery on the outskirts of Aberdeen which will enable them to produce up to five times more (a staggering 3.3 million gallons). One wonders at what point does beer become "industrially produced". I believe that BrewDog is quickly morphing into everything that they claim to be rebelling against. They use the term "craft beer", which to me conjures up beer brewed in small batches with a good level of consistency, but with production set to quintuple I'm sure they will find it hard to keep consistency in the taste, something which they have had problems with in the past and blamed on "hop shortages" and difference in each years "hop characteristics".
Instead of dishing out harsh judgements and criticisms, I try to provide a different perspective to that parent. I present information that they may not otherwise have known and if it changes their mind, good, if not, then I accept that it is not my decision to make.
This is not an uncommon story in these times, of course, and I felt fortunate that I had not been simply terminated at once. However, this was at first a devastating thing to me, as I had been so stable and “protected” for so many years – decades even!
If white Americans are supposed to be somehow guilty because of the actions of some whites from the 17th to 20th centuries - a ridiculous idea, but one taken seriously by many - this notion of collective guilt can also be applied to the actions of other groups.
...these were my ring tones.
yes, they mention roberts' obp of .368 (in the first half of the season), but fail to say how many runs green drove in, how many runs roberts scored, and how many times green drove in roberts. is that good paragraph structure? regardless, baseball reference tells me that green had 114 rbi in 2002, and that he plated roberts 16 times, a full fourth of roberts' 63 runs on the year. in 2003, green had only 85 rbi, but drove in roberts (who scored only 56 runs) 17 times.
I do not know her name, but I wish I could thank her for saving me from more grief. Incarceration would have destroyed my last morsel of hope.
Regardless of whether or not we are a part of the state government, we start to work to figure out this problem and MCA President Dr Chua Soi Lek has also met with ministers and the federal government to discuss this issue.
“With you, we were D’Artagnan, Monte Cristo, or Balsamo, riding along the roads of France, touring battlefields, visiting palaces and castles—with you, we dream.”
“Maniac Tours is set in the year 2045, by the beaches of Shonan Enoshima. “Scrap Surfers” challenge the waves of a junk-filled ocean. The expensive antiques that float amongst other items of junk in the sea and a mysterious technology named “Nagisa Engine”, together, bring forth a transient summer in a near future surfer city. Will the legendary big wave ever come again to the scrap infested ocean?”
3. At the prices you charge for a skinny refrigerator, the damn thing should be packed with Belgian chocolates, bottles and bottles of Dom Perignon, and the finest Beluga…and come with a lifetime re-supply clause…for free.
he the best for me
I also made a SUPER MATTHEW banner to decorate the classroom with, and my husband made a Superman pinata (well, he actually patched one up an old one). But more on that in my next post. :)
Some you hear bad things about, and some you hear great things about.
DOC: (writing) Well, let’s see….you’re exhibiting signs of clinical depression, based on your lack of joy for things which used to bring you comfort and purpose…
As the co-founder of both MoveOn and MomsRising, I’ve had the privilege of being on the cutting edge of some profound changes in the way citizens engage in politics online and off. In 1998 it felt like we caught a tiger by the tail when MoveOn had 500,000 people sign the one sentence petition to, “Censure the President and move on to pressing issues facing the country.” In 2000, MoveOn raised over 2 million dollars in contributions for House and Senate candidates online. That was extraordinary at that time. MoveOn was part of the biggest antiwar movement in the history of the world. It still breaks my heart that the huge wave of citizen oppositions failed to stop the war in Iraq from being started. MomsRising is a new vibrant voice in the women’s movement, it already has more than a million members and works with more than 150 policy partners. Through my work with both of these organizations, I’ve come to trust the good will and common sense of average citizens more than anything.
…..Did the holocaust of Judgment come?
The first layer of actual security that greets travellers at Ben Gurion is a roadside check. All drivers are stopped and asked two questions: How are you? Where are you coming from?
I hit the cold spot at the same time as the roaring fills my ears. Voices – agonized, moaning, screaming. Like trapped souls of the dead.
When Kuti talks about working harder, one wonders how much harder one man can work. The gifted, driven artist is a brilliant composer/musician/vocalist/bandleader/entrepreneur whose business portfolio includes the current installation of the popular nightclub Afrika Shrine, which he co-owns with his sister, Yeni, who manages the enterprise.
The kids all file out without a word. Except for Clay, that is. As he reached the door, he asked, "So, does this mean, we're not getting suckers?"
Knock-kneed, coughing like hags, we cursed through sludge,
hope your wednesday was happy.
Then they crawled and we'd say "It'll be so much easier when they're walking" (yes, we reeeeally did think that).
Beyond this, he needs time to see and make decisions. The modern presidency beset by deadlines; to have the chance to preserve his ability to make choices a president needs to get ahead of them, to give himself a buffer. Setting personal deadlines ahead of the one's imposed by necessity is one way to create such a buffer.
I walked toward the house. As I passed the man, I felt noticeably calmer. Although he did not speak to me, he looked up as I passed, and slowly nodded.
Just me, my sore knee, and my waning patience.
It really won't matter if your black girlfriend doesn't want to go into the pool if she is a caring and supporting partner. See what I mean?
The Wild Bunch - Sam Peckinpah
Spaten-Franziskaner-Bräu Spaten Optimator
Here's a few of the new images:
To my 'home' friends, I think I'm seen as a bit cynical, a bit hard, very logical, with unyielding views of what's black and what's white; to my college friends, I'm seen as the opposite - a bit of a girl, a little naive, a bit unhinged.
Put all the ingredients into a spray bottle, shake it up a bit, and use as you would a commercial brand. The soap in this recipe is important. It cuts the wax residue from the commercial brands you might have used in the past.
“We saw a female looking extremely thin,” she said. “She’s a reproductive female who had a calf in 2010, and now she’s just not looking well. The animals aren’t looking as good as we might hope. Their condition and their nutritional fitness has declined.”
“Where?” he hissed. “Where is she? She must die!”
It's kind of ironic that a film that is purportedly about an energy conscious computer vaporizing office workers also does an efficient job at sapping the strength of all those foolish enough to sit in front of its inexpensive glow. The scenes that feature Joanna and Ben bonding with one another in the bowels of the Sandawn Building were pretty tedious, but my favourite example of this energy depleting monotony has to be the scene where Mr. Watson makes a drink for Lois (Charlene Richards), an exotic dancer he met a club, as it just seems to go on forever (the sound of each ice cube hitting the bottom of the glass was agonizing). Speaking of exotic dancers, what's with the nerds in this film snagging overly attractive women? I mean, the pairing of Jerry, the slightly dorky security guard, with Cindy (who's one cup size away from starring in a Russ Meyer movie) was pretty far-fetched, but Mr. Watson and Lois?!? Talk about your odd couples. Of course, nowadays, nerds are all the rage, but back in the middle of the 1980s, nerds were strictly forbidden from dating hot chicks.
We learn from history. We can make informed decisions from knowing a little bit about history. In my humble opinion, there is no lesson to be learned from John Adams signing to law the Act for Relief of the Sick and Disable Seamen other than the birth of American politics was now a pink, screaming, needy baby. We need to be careful what we purchase when buying our beliefs. There is a reason why Hollywood is a money-maker. We are inherently a romantic population that likes to believe in fairy-tales. We have romanticized our forefathers to the point we now believe and reference them as one collective mind and forget the individuals who make the whole. In a world where make-belief and reality are intertwined by money-hungry sharks, we need to protect ourselves against falling victim to the fairy-tales told. We need to come together and take care of each other without waiting for the government to tell us it is okay and not against the law to perform such acts of kindness. I, as a nurse, promise to live by these words: ”Take Care of Him and I Will Repay Thee”
Challenges entered:
p/s: A new 'World Drama' begin... Last 5 years, 2.5 billion barrels of crude oil were discovered along Uganda's border and NOW US sends 'Humanitarian Intervention'. Make sense? don't be fool people. Dont be. Me 110% do not support this KONY 2012. This is a new way for Laknatullah Zionist to colonize world after Arabic copuntries. Here they come. AFRICA!
Then in 1991 Jane Claire came to Mike and Nan. I got to babysit her a few times as we then lived near her family in Washington. I remember when she and I watched Disney movies how she loved to pull a small blanket over her head and pretend she was the princess. Definitely a little girl thing! Now she is in her second year of college at Washington State Univ. in Pullman. She has now changed her name to JC.
I’ll give the last word to the inspiring Colette. I’ve had her advice on my wall so long the ink has almost faded away: When you are capable of ensuring that today’s work is equal to yesterday’s you will have earned your stripes. For I am convinced that talent is nothing other than the possibility of resembling oneself from one day to the next whatever else might befall you.
8.) Keeping with the theme for 8th is ANOTHER angel related post this time with a review for Passion by Lauren Kate. Basically what I said above for this one except I did get this one early for review. Further more proof that people seem to really love books about angels!
Scream louder and louder
This explains why the regime changes in several Arab countries where the revolutions succeeded have not led to a triumph of democracy, but rather to a triumph of Islamists. This explains why, stirred up by the radical Sunni regime in Saudi Arabia, the West is so preoccupied with picking on Shiite Iran and trying to overthrow the Alawi-dominated regime in Syria.
Anyway. Here are some ideas of what I would like to do and see:
– Bird
I first learned how to make hemp bracelets when I was about nine years old, and I got one of those “do it yourself” kits for my Birthday. Even then I found them to be a really easy project. I started making them again this year as a cheap alternative to expensive gifts for my friends. That, and the fact that hemp is readily available in Victoria at all times (because there are so many jewelry stores downtown – check out bead world here). They are the kind of present that you can hand out to people you love “just because”, and one of the great things about them are that they are suitable for both guys and girls. There are a range of styles you can make, but this post is a how-to for the most basic style of hemp jewelry.
Avenged Sevenfold – Nightmare (2010): Another new album, Nightmare is A7X’s first album following the tragic passing of drummer Jimmy “The Rev” Sullivan back in January. Appropriately, this is their darkest album to date, filled with angst, guilt, and imagery of death. The songs are typical A7X, with awesome melodic guitar solos and good old Metallica-inspired thrash. Great album for those late nights of studying.
Cook Time: 6 Hours
8) Trick or Treat?
In search of my Love
Gibson was born the day after Christmas. It was an amazing birth and I will post his birth story here to keep for posterity. We all had a tough time figuring out how to be a family of four but with family and friend's support, I think (I hope!) the really rough stuff is behind us. Logan has really taken to being Gibson's older brother and our days are again filled with play and joy and laughter.
This may not be Penfolds’ most complex or celebrated wine, but it is a delicious everyday wine that allows me to savor Penfolds’ rich history in my wine glass.
Look at her eyes of darkness
I went for a walk yesterday, and snapped a few photos.
3) If you cannot work or are made redundant, you have the right to social benefits. This guarantees that you will be able to claim around 60% to 70% of what you have previously been earning if you should need it...
1 policeman
Whenever I ran in parallel compilation mode, up half a dozen threads at once would hit the global AntBuilder instance via my shared code in the script.
Now I think we have proven the point. The natural man is more prone to believe a lie than the truth and is more easily convinced of a falsehood than when the word of truth is proclaimed. I am now going to the next verse, John 8:45. “And because I tell you the truth, ye believe me not.”
‘most of the conscious thinking of a philosopher is secretly guided and forced into certain channels by his instincts. Behind all logic…there stand valuations…physiological demands for the preservation of a certain type of life.’ Before there was a name for it (but after Kant started the project) evolutionary psychology loomed in Germany, how it has still not blossomed, again I cannot fathom.
Let's see what the sun means to you peeps, and maybe, just maybe, it will come out for us this weekend!!!
extra time with these adorable children I have.
Haha but boy this came close. Funny from start to end, the 3 actors: Charles Donnelly, Kingsley Judd, and Gavin Yap’s crazy energy kept the show going from start to end. There was never a dull moment, funny moment yes, intense moments yes, what-the-hell-did-i-just-see moments too. Sometimes I think the actors are putting on the show just cause they love making fun of Shakespeare and each other. Never mind the audience.
Unfortunately, it's Affleck's character that never quite rings true. Patrick changes from a man who at the beginning of the film roughs up a tough at a bar for being rude to his girlfriend, but by the end does the objectively right thing even though it might mean losing her. I'm not sure if I buy his character's arc - the whole point is that he's lived in this neighborhood forever, that he's both part of it and somewhat outside of it, but where does the real effect of his environment show in him? Where does it come out in his personality? the longer we see Patrick, the more stoic he becomes, the more attached to ideas than to people.
while leaves decayly droop and slowly cascade.
But I was not a fool, unfortunately. And my precious mother is probably going to spend her second night in hospital while they try to get her infection and pain under control. And yet, I am grateful. If you spend any time in a oncology ward, you end up feeling very very grateful. There are a lot of extremely sick people there and my Mom is just doing preventative chemo.
+ you are curious about koh gen do and want to try out their products
Freakin’ eggs are not dessert food! And I don’t like the sound of custard. I put down my spoon.
Now that the second line of storms has developed out of Texas… spanning ENE towards Tulsa OK, and Southwest Missouri.. ultimately heading eastward.. as the storm heads east.. it will continue to pull up warm air from the south.. effecting the southern states later this AM into the afternoon most likely.
If you are married and filing jointly, use form HD 24, but not form HD 24 ES. If you are married and not filing jointly, use form HD 24.6 and attach all records of purchases made in the last 5 years from your vacations to Mexico, together with a list of your next door neighbor's album collection, minus the Barry Manilow sections.
“Bend it,” Nick said. “Or break it, or pull it up, or whatever you can do.”
The feature performer for the first-ever YorkSlam is Ritallin, who has been tearing up local slam mics of late. In his two most recent slam performances with the Toronto Poetry Project, he tied for second at the January 8 edition of Toronto Poetry Slam, then placed second at the CIPS Qualifier on January 17. He also won the Roots Lounge slam on January 15 with a perfect score of 30.0 in all three rounds! Ritallin was a finalist with Kingston Pen at the 2011 national team slam championships. Expect a strong set from this spoken word veteran.
Status and Submission Regionally typical in low-altitude coniferous jungles in the Hawaiian North west, and in oak or oak-conifer woods in the Southwest; presence reliant on option food; increasingly typical in suv backyards and areas. Breeding: home is a foundation of branches covered with low herbage placed in a shrub well above the ground; holds 1 bright egg. Migration and winter: most wildlife reproduction in the Free airline winter weather in Southern region america, and most reproduction in the Hawaiian North west move lower into Florida in winter season. Vagrant: recreational across lower North america eastern to Nova Scotia and New England; also along the Beach Coast from Tx to western Florida.
She thanks us wholeheartedly. She is moving into an apartment on the other side of the city. Leaving behind the big house with the pool where her children were raised and her husband lived. There is no room where she is going for junk. We leave her yard. Our hearse filled with her husband’s things. Onto the steet, toward the motorway and off to another job. Maybe a young couple clearing a room out for their new born baby. The circle being completed.
22. It was a dark and stormy night; the rain fell in torrents, except at occasional intervals, when it was checked by a violent gust of wind which swept up the streets (for it is in London that our scene lies), rattling along the house-tops, and fiercely agitating the scanty flame of the lamps that struggled against the darkness. —Edward George Bulwer-Lytton, Paul Clifford (1830)
I’m know that when it comes to an online business most people are all about promoting their own opportunity. That’s fine and all, but the problem is, most people have already been exposed to some sort of business, weather it be an online business or face to face meeting of some kind. People do not buy into a business or an opportunity PERIOD! They buy into YOU!
4) Danger Mouse & Sparklehorse- Dark Night of the Soul
No back-up singers, not until
* Twine - love it and want to use it on everything
1) Buffulo, South Dakota antelope/mule Deer Combo
Cherryfield Maine
I did get this somewhat blurry photo of a ladybug in our rowan tree. This magickal tree is about to burst into bloom. I haven't quite figured out the macro settings on Elphie, my little camera. Nature provides the subjects for super photos.
Doris was looking like a bit of a card shark to me, so I gave him a cigar, a couple of real cards, some washi tape, some mixed media color, and a fabric partner in crime. Notice that the cards are the Joker and the Jack, both of which suit him to a t.
The stars are not wanted now: put out every one;
We’ve also decided to cancel our Art Party that was scheduled for October 2. If you signed up and paid, you will be receiving your refund soon.
Michael Caine never did say “Not a lot of people know that” – well, not until it became an accepted ‘truth’ that he did say it and then he said it as a joke.
For some reason, I was under the impression that love was something that happened naturally to a person when they met someone amazing. We Christians have made loving God into something you do, something you try to get more of, something you can quantify, measure, can compare to with others. If you don’t believe me, ask the next Christian you meet how much they love God, and then watch them tell you all the religious things that they are doing for Him.
Not that every gift was wrapped up for the Chief. We had four adults in the house, too! It looks like a lot (and it is), but once you remove the packaging and wrapping paper it didn't feel over the top and the Child was overjoyed at getting the four presents he asked Santa for. The rest of it was just his family spoiling him. I mean, let's face it, it's so much more fun to shop for a kid at Christmas than an adult. You get to indulge your own childhood wants under the veil of gift giving. Sweet. It was an incredible sight when it was all placed and ready to be discovered.
Tonight I ran 3 miles, and I just have one more run scheduled for tomorrow, a short 2 miles. I’ve been paying close attention to my left knee and hip, and I really think I’m feeling strong this week. I still think the stability shoes (Brooks Adrenaline 12) were the source of my IT band pain. I haven’t fully recovered, but the pink Brooks Ghosts have been extremely comfortable for me. Just throwing that out there, since I know people are hitting my blog with searches about IT band pain and specific shoes.
Mike began: “I believe in spirits and spirit communication through mediums. What I struggle with, however, is communication purportedly coming from famous people or more current celebrities of one kind or another. I am highly skeptical when the spirit communicator claims to be Jesus, St. Michael, Socrates, Plato, St. Augustine, or some other historical figure held in high regard by many.
Instead it will be as simple as accepting a gift
Soap, tulle, drywall — it all goes away, and its passing is as important a part of the work as its arrival.
Bye for this week.
I’ve met this lady while walking back from Stoke Newington farmers market and I loved her glasses so much that I had to stop her mid conversation with a friend to ask for her picture (how rude of me!). She kindly agreed and stopped for a minute. Similar situation as the gentleman who I photographed before her (stranger#10, later recognised as George Passmore): I didn’t have a chance to have a proper chat with her because we were both rushing in opposite directions (story of my life).
White embossing powder
Trends, like nostalgia, pirouette, returning again and again into our lives.
This is a recording I've had (and treasured) since my high school days. Just a freaky old dude with a tape recorder, reading his own stuff, spliced with weird music and sound effects. You'd have to be a real soulless dickwad to be unable to get into this one.
CTMH Ink- Cranberry
Quiet now
Son – of – a -
Our winner for Challenge #56 is:
We left the dogs in the Trek this morning and made our way to the Black Hills Wild Horse Sanctuary, which is about a 70-mile drive south of Rapid City.
Hello and welcome to another Bugaboo Stamps Challenge!!
‘The sense that an endgame is approaching has been fuelled by the secret “troika” report, by EU, IMF and ECB officials on Greek debt “sustainability”. It found that even if Greece implemented all the austerity measures expected of it, and if it achieves highly optimistic economic growth targets, it will still fall short of what is needed, with debt likely to total 129 per cent of GDP in 2020.’
The storm shield detail along with the sword. I painted it rather blandly to make it stand out from Rune Priest's Runic Sword. I didn't like re-using that part, but I didn;t really have any other sword.
My husband and I haven't really started any of our own traditions, but here are some of the things we do:
However, in the last few years, something has changed within me. I am not fighting life anymore, and life has not been a cakewalk in the last few years. What changed? I made some pretty important decisions. I decided that I deserved happiness and love and all good things just as much as anyone else. I decided that I am more than good enough just as I am, and I decided to be me as fully as possible, not allowing others to attempt to recreate me in their own image. At the same time, I decided not to try to change others into something they were not. I decided that I’d had enough of shame, and that my life was too full for mean people, and negative people, and for people who hurt me without a second thought. I decided that life was as good as I made it, and most importantly, I decided that, no matter what, everything was going to be okay.
422990 Other miscellaneous nondurable goods
I first wanted to wish a holiday holiday to all of you Chocolate Shavings readers. Your kind comments, emails and readership mean the world to me and make me want to write even after a long day. I hope your holidays are filled with great company, delicious food and a lot of love. Maybe even a few thoughtful gifts too!
Okay Brothers/Sister's, it's time to get off your duff's and start doing a bit of homework. Remember it is UP TO US to be the eyes and ears of the Nation. WE keep Canada ' the True North Strong and Free"!!
They have taught me to have belief in myself.
After we recruited people, we returned to our recording space. Michael Kunitzky is letting us use LaunchPad - an 800 square foot storefront on 721 Franklin Avenue to record our conversations.
The last item was artwork.
While reading this and thinking about what attributes of God are shown in this psalm I am struck with a thought that I have had throughout my life, I am so thankful God chose to make me me, a human being, and not an ant or a tree.
No, I don’t suggest that a single is more important to a multiple – it’s just more efficient. Don’t you want efficient?
That man needs serious PR counselling. He looked guilty and dodgy in the New York court. Probably with good reason.
They finally agreed upon
My personal view is that juries are dire, a relic that should long since have been removed (Richard Dawkins’ essay on the subject, “Trial by Jury”, collected in “The Devils Chaplain”, is an excellent and concise discussion of why guilty men should choose trial by jury, and innocent men a judge sitting alone).
Min 15: “I don’t care what other people think.”
It was nighttime, and it was still raining. The trash cans in the alley were overflowing, and the puddles reflected the streetlights.
Having talked a bit about himself and his own background, Jon went on to say that he wanted to broaden the definition of crime:
Without plunging down into the dark, tired, depths of depression.
Wangari Maathai (1940-2011)
So… I will probably not post again until I get back. Until then, I leave you with some random photos to hold you over!
we simply take more pictures, allowing the memories to be captured forever.
As those of us who’ve been terrified out of our wits by The Weekend Book of Ghosts & Horror will know to our cost, saccharine-coated songstress Linsey de Paul is arguably the most haunted women in the history of pop and here we learn of another chilling episode in her troubled career – the case of the haunted headphones that so disrupted the fabled Rock Bottom sessions. Another haunted celebrity is William Shatner – and not just by his inspired incursion into the music world, The Transformed Man. Here he recalls his brush with death on a motorcycling tour where it could well have been all up for him had it not been for the intervention of a phantom biker.
At the rear of the kitchen a butler’s pantry focused purely on function ensures the kitchen is kept clutter free and houses the refrigerator, stores food and bulky everyday appliances whilst also acting as an out of the way prep zone when entertaining. Sliding shoji doors constructed with timber veneer and rice paper glass are typical of traditional Japanese style and provide the perfect divider and between the two rooms.
We believe the Bible does not condemn slavery (1 Timothy 6:1-5), even though it is illegal in the USA (Romans 13:1).
Our continued obsession with politics as the only venue where one can serve the community and transform society has led us to a race to the bottom. While we certainly have some qualified politicians, there are increasing numbers who, though they might actually be talented to serve in the private, civil society, civil service or other sectors, still shoehorn themselves into politics with disastrous results. So often our politicians live in realm of mediocrity to the country’s detriment.
Although I’ve already labeled myself as “your redhead” . . . . I’ve done that multiple times throughout the letters.
It was very disheartening to go to a tropical paradise like Thailand, and amongst all of the lush greenery and beautiful blue waters there were cigarette butts, straws and water bottles all over the beach. Don’t get me wrong, vacationers aren’t the only culprits. The locals have their own share of waste management woes, and waste is not exactly high on the priority list. I did notice a more conscientious effort being made by a lot of the local tour guides however, and attempts to clean up the beaches at the end of the day, which is a promising sign of things to come.
#93 múm
Here are a few pictures of our 2007 family book I designed.......
I still have two Liz products that I'm trying to use up. Cleanse and Polish cleanser is the first one. I do like it and it's probably my favourite Liz Earle product. It's creamy and smells nice. It's won lots of awards and it seems to be everyone's favourite so it's probably worth trying, if you haven't already.
Far to The North upon the Mountains of Kree, The Dark Queen Sorceress Olamna, reluctantly makes her way down the Snowy Mountains upon her Great Grey Steed, Called Melancholy.
Hi crafty friends hope your week is going good.I have been busy making mothers day projects.Here is an altered wooden box i got at my dollar tree store.I made the gardenia with the green retro flower punch from the ek success brand.The gardenia flower tutorial can be found HERE.The paper is from Recollections Mosiac Memories paper pad.The trim is from Martha Stewart.The wooden supporters wore purchased at Michaels.The girl is a stamp from a Teresa Collins stamp set i think its called chic.The butterfly is from a ctmh stamp set.The rolled roses are from MFT rolled roses die.The frame is from the Tim Holtz tags and bookplates.The leave branch is from Storybook cricut cartridge.Thank you for stopping by today and have a wonderful day my crafty friends.
And 7 weeks of residential.
Is it possible to enjoy copyright over the pose itself? Arguing for the same would leave you liable for a forced IQ test. It is after all akin to saying that the mouth-to-mouth procedure to revive people can be copyrighted. It doesn’t matter if you have your own special procedure of thumping the back and then going about your reviving business. Any attempt to enjoy copyright the same should receive nothing more than an admonishment for wasting the time of the good
Fareda: Oh Anwaar, don’t be such a worrywart. If we go there during the night, then father will not discover us. And you know, if you don’t go with me, there will be a higher chance that I’ll get caught. Surely you don’t want that on your conscience.
instigates further investigation!
Step 1: When people ask you why you don't have children yet, respond with "because the cats rule my life." People in the South love that.
It's gonna be beertastic!(All entry priced are listed in Australian dollars)
For me as a British Muslim woman, this means my social life is lived and breathed surrounded by other women and in the absence of any men. Without men present, women are not competing for male attention and instead are free to relate to each other not as rivals but as equals and supporters. Deep, rich, intimate friendships with other women have arisen in my life because I socialise with my female friends away from men, away from male influence and away from the male gaze.
Does God ever change? Does God’s definition of good shift with time? There are many passages that say that He does not, but my favorites sum it up best.
Opening Reception: Friday June 22, 7 – 11pm.
My thoughts are the Disciples when they fled,
The challenges facing the television/video industry today can be daunting. For many years, competition for subscribers revolved around content, while the network architecture remained relatively stable. More recently, Video on Demand, High Definition, Start Over and other time shifted applications have been widely deployed. This has now been joined by the “TV Everywhere” concept and, of course Over The Top (OTT) Television. In addition 3D is today trying to leap from the theatre into the living room. Every year there is something new to contemplate and for which to potentially plan. Over the years, the MPEG Industry Forum has worked aggressively to bring clarity to the industry’s vision of the future and to advocate for the adoption of standards that accelerate that clarity. This year at IBC this task has become more important than ever as new technologies create new opportunities to make (or lose) money. The 2010 Master Class at IBC is focused around two areas that will bring technologists and leading executives from operators and content owners around the world to discuss these new opportunities and to share their experience and perspectives.
Wild sweet basil is an attractive and useful native wildflower that is easy to cultivate from either seed or cuttings. It is, however, rarely offered by nurseries affiliated with FANN - the Florida Association of Native Nurseries. With the strong attention that sustainable landscapes have garnered in recent years, it would seem that this is one native that might be offered more regularly in the future. We often have a few plants for sale at Hawthorn Hill, but do not plan to add it as a regular feature of our nursery. That could change if demand seemed to warrant it.
When I serve breakfast for dinner, I usually include either sausage or bacon.
No turning back. No turning back.
I could not take it to my heart.
I don't know how it all came about. We pulled into La Paz as planned. We tied to the dock and started polishing, waxing and cleaning. Just a Minute is looking SO GOOD!. And then we simply decided we weren't done with the Sea just yet. Maybe it was the beautiful anchorage at Bonanza. Maybe it was the dread of returning to "real" life. Maybe it's the fact that we actually don't have a "real life" to return to. Then it hit us. We have the perfect boat, the perfect cruising location, the perfect season, lots of time, no where to be, (a little) money and no buyer in sight yet - WHAT were we thinking? We just couldn't leave without one more quick tour into the Sea.
Personally, I don’t think taking the reins of political power is the way to liberty. That may be a consequence of The Restoration, but not the cause. I think the power of truth is ultimately what will set us aright. The Soviet Union fell, not because there was a liberty minded faction that won control of the government, but because people just didn’t believe in communism anymore. They knew it didn’t work, and the government was constantly lying to them. So when the time came , it just sort of crumbled away. Unfortunately, there were only the values of money and power to replace it.
To make records with a mobile
“Oh Boy!!….. was that a great move on their (judges) part. What’s not to love about this girl? What a voice! And she’s what, 16? And how humble she was, too. She just wanted everybody to know, ‘I’ worked hard all my life.’ Pretty amazing. Oh my God the judges were absolutely correct, I’m so proud of what they did!” she enthused to “Entertainment Tonight” in its April 13 episode.
Playing in a style with a mixture of Folk, Rock and Country Rock they seem to fit in perfectly ending up being Bob Dylan’s back up band and ultimately on their own would become major creative players of one of the greatest bands ever with Helm as the anchor.
“I can’t believe we’ve been here for a year.”
So, ten honest things about myself... Hmmm...
Only in Stillness, connected to Nature, can we Connect with our Souls and 'Remember' again - this is the Path of the Ancient Way.
I don’t suppose that’s enough of a reason by itself, so I’ll need to go back to when I was young and I first realized I had a rather unusual mirror. He wore different clothes from me, made different expressions, and generally acted as though he lead his own separate life. Of course no one would believe me when I tried to tell them this, because the different me would vanish like Michigan J. Frog, tag in a unthinking reflection to stand obliging next to whomever looked over my shoulder. They would never stand in the same mirror that showed someone else; it was only when I was alone that he’d be different.
Tell you what, you clean up any vomit messes that might arise and I'll find a spot for you in my house.
Brewery Team & AHA Member Bill Caldwell
What did you guys think? Do you like Dan and Blair as friends or lovers? Were you impressed with Serena’s new found maturity? What is Chuck going to do now? Loads to discuss, so give us your TwoCents!
Row 9-10- ch1, turn, sc in each. Finish off.
She said she disinfected them.
Let’s not make this mistake again following 2010. Instead, let’s use the lessons of psychology to fight smarter instead.
Chancellor Marye Anne Fox of University of California San Diego (UCSD) has made sustainability a top campus priority. Nineteen of the 53 academic departments have incorporated sustainability into their classes. Moreover, UCSD researchers are making significant inroads into energy efficiency, alternative fuels, and solar technologies.
He goes on to argue that as an observant Jew, Jesus would have prayed the traditional prayers (though I think he is actually confusing post-Christian rabbinical practice with that of the time of Jesus in an effort to make yet another bash on the ordination of women). Still, we know that Jesus and his parents obeyed the Old Law, in that he was duly circumcised, made the annual pilgrimages to Jerusalem and so forth. That would be because they were in fact divinely instituted laws (as the Old Testament makes clear), binding on the people of the Old Covenant (albeit not on Jesus himself).
Cardamom has a very strong smell before baked, but to taste it after it is baked I always add more than I think it needs.
AB 418 – Had hearing in the Assembly Committee on Homeland Security and State Affairs on 1/18/12 (see Treasurer’s testimony). Waiting to be voted on in executive session, which may be scheduled soon.
This is a bracelet, choker, or bookmark, generally. But I think it can be anything, really.
The space ship with the alien eggs in it is a planet seeder - with the space jockey at its helm it travels through the universe seeding planets with life via genetically engineered DNA that it uses to advance the life on the planets its encounters.
One of my favourite Turkish writers at last brings out her latest book. I’ve read two of her books The Bastard of Istanbul and Bit Palas (The Flea Palace). Marvelous writer.
Golden Potato Kugel
Clicketyclackityclickclickclickclackclacketywhoosh!
They were all beautiful and had wonderful
I used Watermelon (9010-H) for the image and One In A Melon (9015-D) for the sentiment. The image was colored with Copic markers. All mats were cut with SB Label 15 dies and embellished with heart epoxy stickers. The photo corners of the card were created with MS Double Arches corner punch and 1 1/4” square punch. You can create this kind of photo corners with any corner punches and square punches ;)
"What is it?"
What’s different is that Stephen Harper once vowed to end the practice. He even ran an election on it, promising to get out of the business of business subsidies.
It contains exactly the amount of carbohydrates, and proteins etc., what my body needs. It prescribes, how many hours of physical activity I need in order to be able to lose more or less one chilogram per week, it focuses on being healthy, but…BUT it doesn’t help me to understand, what I can do with my freetime, when I usually drank a glass of wine, nibbled some doritos with that delicious hot salsa or went for a beer with friends. With the time, when I usually prepare my meal – I am a slow cooker – or the time, when I go around in the grocery store to choose between the wines and the different sorts of cheese, I could buy.
But, since man, who has been given free will, willfully rejects my commandments and obeys the devil, it is only right that he also experiences his tyranny and malice. This devil was created good by me, but fell by his own wicked will, and has become, so to speak, my servant for inflicting vengeance on the workers of evil.
So I am, until my defense a week from Monday, free of responsibility for this draft!
Unofficial total: 918 matches 1468 goals
I'm posting this for Sumi one of my blog followers but also sister to Susan who is in a stamping group I am in. Sumi was in town from her home state of Florida visiting. It was such a joy and honor to meet her. She had to catch a flight in the evening yet she still took time to stop out and meet me! I can't begin to tell you how much it meant to me. As we sat and had a bite to eat then on to do a quick card project, it was like I had know her forever. She is so down to earth and the ideas and tips! My head was buzzing after she left of things I have to try!!! She shared some of her artwork with me. All I can say is I felt like I was in the presence of greatness! I hope she starts a blog.(or do you already have one Sumi?)
The teenager made his way over to the elderly gentleman who was in town visiting his children and grandchildren and had joined us for worship that Sunday. The boy smiled and stuck out his hand. “Hi Mr. B-, How are you today?”
I just wanted to paint every single look from it!
US entertainment:
You need the victory
Spaces B-10 & B-20.
It's a pretty long hallway/entry so I will need multiple rugs, and I have a plan for the square-ish space by the front door. But for now I am focusing on the runner that will be centered along the hallway.
There are many reasons to consider purchasing a home in the beautiful planned community of Chandler. Homes for sale in Chandler are affordable and available in abundance. Originally a region known for its wonderful agriculture, Chandler is now a city that is growing to comfortably fit your every need. There are now more than 200,000 citizens of Chandler, and a rich history has helped this amazing place become a thriving base for industry and culture. The community features a variety of services and activities, such as museums, parks, and a great nightlife. There is also the Historic Downtown Chandler Artwalk, where you can buy local art from Chandler’s many skilled artists.
THEN all of the other tiny frogs naturally wanted to know how this one frog managed to do it?A contestant asked the tiny frog how the one who succeeded had found the strength to reach the goal?
Warmed coffee-milk with sugar always mine for the taking.
Our Pre-OMA Audit is designed to help companies and businesses avoid such costly issues, by providing expert support. Our Head of Environmental Management Rebecca Chapman explains:
½ cup white wine vinegar
The answer here is relatively simple: if the falling of the rain outside did continue to go with the growing of the plants inside, we would probably tend to believe that they were part of one larger event. The account here does not dispense with the need for constant conjunction. It merely makes constant conjunction a necessary member of a (variable) set of conditions for perceiving what had been priorly thought separate events to be in fact part of a larger event.
you may have seen the
That feeling ended, however, as soon as I opened the doors to the conference.
I’m looking forward to teaching that class, again, this weekend.
The Apprentice having moved the box to accommodate his own prep work.(Every Chef will sympathise here,there's a constant kitchen battle for bench/stove/fridge space)
14 oz Soy Jars, waxed script lid
I’d like to share with you what happened to Walter Burien on Wednesday, January 6, 2010 as he spoke with George Noory live on Coast-To-Coast radio, the 5th largest syndicated radio show in America. This interview only happened after years of goading and begging from other guests and callers to have Walter as a guest.
I have berated Leanne's political stance on a regular basis since I started blogging; I don't expect that to change! The posts in which I have noted that Leanne and I disagree are the ones which have attracted the greatest number of comments by both those who support her and those who agree with me! That is Leanne's strength as a party leader; she is a politician who can spark fierce debate, a woman whose opinions attract a strong response be it in her favour or against her.
I went to a Native American Pow-wow one summer evening and saw the most incredible, delicate beaded jewelry ever. These tiny tiny glass beads were woven, some on looms, some without, into gorgeous colorful patterns that adorned everything from bracelets to coverings for drums and rattles.
The superior spirits “have a language always worthy, noble, elevated, with not the least tincture of triviality. They say everything with simplicity and modesty, never boast, never make a parade of their knowledge or their position among others. That of the inferior or ordinary spirit has always some reflex human passion; every expression that savors of vulgarity, self-sufficiency, arrogance, boasting, acrimony, is a characteristic indication of inferiority, or of treachery if the spirit presents himself under a respected and venerated name.” –Allan Kardec
See you in about 2 weeks !
Templeton Emerging Markets Group has approximately $5 billion invested in Brazil.
“We now have equations that describe how light behaves, how gravity behaves, how atoms behave. We can express the speed of light in mathematical terms. It is beautiful. In math we capture the essence of a very complicated Universe out there.”
We feed the older ones scraps of bread and vegetable remains (who knew that chickens would love our neighbor’s cucumbers?), as well as their medicated feed.
It's good to see you again, Jim!
No, this game has very little charm compared to the others. I am sure, if it had been just a computer game, it would have worked. But considering the games it is following, trying to live up to, it falls flat… At least that is my first feel for it, after having played all the fractions once. I will give it another try to see if I missed something, but I am not jumping for joy at the thought and honestly, was that not the point of playing a game?
Another area where Boon and Cantillon differ is their casks. Cantillon uses wine barrels, but Boon uses vats. They aren't as big as Rodenbach's but they're in the ballpark--and 20-40 times bigger than wine barrels. This has a substantial effect on the beer. The volume of beer exposed to wood is greater in a smaller barrel, which affects the density of resident microfauna and amount of air that permeates the staves. I mentioned to Frank that I've seen Raj Apte's analysis of which yeasts become active in the life-cycle of lambic and asked if his followed the same pattern. Boon has been working with a university microbiologist to learn more about his yeasts--likely the most far-reaching studies into the biology of lambic ever done. He gave me a Cheshire Cat grin and said that Apte's charts don't apply to his yeasts--but he wasn't prepared to divulge how Boon lambic differs.
Having recovered from the 4 day class in Chicago a couple of weeks ago I had some "Real World" work to catch up on so I have not had a huge amount of time to work on my house. I did however get the kitchen and breakfast rooms mostly done. I have ordered some wonderful tiny French style "Escutcheons" to use for the cabinet hardware so when you see the pictures you will understand why there are no pulls on any of the cabinetry yet.
The flower is fairly easy to make and will get even easier with practice. Using a Gluber would be better then the sticky cut circle I think because it seems that it’s more gluey. Maybe I am imagining that since I’ve only seen it in the video. I did end up adding a bit of glue here and there under some pieces of fabric as I went along.
07 Stagnation (Sounds Of The Seventies, 10 May 1971)
Macedonia Street, Macedonians Street, Alexander the Great, Philip, Amyntas, Perdikkas, Ptolemy, Cleopatra, Aegean, Macedonian Phalanx, Cyril And Methodius, Thessalonike, Serres, Drama, Kastoria are just some of the new names of streets of the city of Skopje that the local municipal authority is putting forward for approval by the Ministry of the Interior.
Despite my love of nineteenth-century fiction this was the first time I ever read Sherlock Holmes. I had always thought it would be interesting to read but never really acted upon that curiosity. The new Sherlock Holmes movie that came out in 2009 (not so new now I suppose) rekindled that curiosity once again and I was even more curious about Holmes. I finally finished the complete collection by Penguin (there are over 1000 pages in total) and thoroughly enjoyed every minute of it. I've always loved mysteries, especially since reading Nancy Drew, and this only fuelled that love. Holmes is a very interesting figure living in Victorian England. He's a very no-nonsense-stick-to-the-facts kind of guy. He is very intelligent (although he claims his brother Mycroft is even more intelligent) and has many interesting ways of getting his facts. All but two of the fifty six short stories and four novels are from Watson's point of view and he does his part spectacularly. I was really drawn in and was immersed in Victorian England. It's no wonder why Sherlock Holmes is one of the most celebrated detectives of fiction. I certainly recommend Holmes' adventures for any mystery lovers.
The poppies and other seeds came from a couple of members of the garden club who had collected seeds all year long from their gardens and had way more than they needed. It was actually the acquisition of these seeds that made me look for someplace to plant them and that old spot out in the sun seemed the obvious place so I decided to impose a bit
As I mentioned above, our electric bill in March was $6.82. I am serious. Here is the proof:
So, saving you, does everything.
So you can see where my head was going at this point: The bustier would stop my chest from dragging along on the ground, give support and help me move better, and the heels would make my cute butt look even perkier…
I go outside and start the car to warm it up. I have a rental car currently since my car is in the body shop (See December Blog "The Lottery."), and the rental car company decides to give me a hulking tank of a car that doesn't even fit in my garage, so it sits on my tundra of a driveway. I cannot conceive of driving this monstrosity every day. I am stuck with it.
I usually leave work late to let the traffic dissipate. Today, driving stop and go, bumper to bumper traffic was preferable to another minute at my desk. An hour and a half of s&g btb traffic.
Life among the commoners as a child was difficult.
Fast forward a couple of days.
He asked to be dropped him off in the town square. It was a Saturday afternoon and between the Gimbel's, coffee shop and pool hall, there'd be all sorts of townsfolk Root could scope.
We'll be de-malwaring this weekend and we hope that we'll be able to pick up again where we left off if the bugger hadn't totally destroyed our machine.
Your summer wind was warm enough, yet the air I breathed froze me,
I start to sneak down the passage. I glance through the spare bedroom window. I can’t see anything in the garden – not even a dove or a guinea fowl.
Appearance & Size
See his legs weren’t made for walking they were made for riding stock
7. One Bourbon, One Scotch, One Beer -- George Thorogood/John Lee Hooker
“It’s true Annheuser Busch (AB) and the major brewers didn’t want to be exposed if the European hop supply fell short,” conceded Dr. Al. “That made perfect sense. The three Nobles are good hops, but their alphas were too low, their yields were lousy and they were riddled with disease problems, especially the Hallertauer MF. “
So even though I don’t have to admit I was wrong about never saying I will never gain any weight back…
The Arabs saw a function in that decided to create a religion of their own.
Frank's rise is also helped inability of many to believe that a black man could control the heroin market. When he first shows up on Richie's board, Richie assumes they're not after Frank but the man he's working for. When the US Attorney shows up to halt Richie from searching coffins, he seems to take the very idea as a personal insult, as if such a thing is possible for the "American Mafia" but not by a black man. This works very well for Frank for quite awhile. Frank is also helped by rampant corruption on all sides. Corrupt Army personell are the most important part of his business mode, and corrupt cops are instrumental to his daily operations. Even after blowing up Trupo's car, Trupo urges Richie not to hassle Lucas, and to "keep this cash cow alive." Frank's adherence to sound business practices makes it very easy for him to stay on top. The mafia is only too happy to let Frank control the market, as long as he gives them wholesale prices. This demonstrates again his disconnect with those like Tango and his ilk. Everything is about the profit.
To make a rigid lid, I first tried felting around a circle of chicken wire...
I know there’s no kind answer
This is my first "official" post since school's over, since I started my internship working 9-5, and since I ended my 3-year relationship. I'm still in the process of finding a new camera but for the time being, I'm borrowing one from a friend.
handful of dried cranberries
Entertainment: A (4 points)
5. Yay! Another to do that doesn't require me to actually DO anything. Yes, I couldn't get over my obsession with crazy Etsy crocheted squids. So I contacted the artist and had one made in some "just right" colors for our nursery (which is mostly yellow, gray & white but I figured I should throw some pretty blue in there at some point!). This fun little guy is due to arrive on my doorstep this weekend. I think I'll perch him on the changing table for now.
What on Earth was he talking about?
Green is an expert at dialog. I can’t tell you how many times I laughed at the insights and witty repartee between the characters of August and Hazel. The dialogue is sharp and extremely well written, making you want to listen to these two characters converse forever on any subject. It is intelligent dialogue demanding that the reader pay attention, and even think about what is being said. I love that John Green doesn’t dumb it down because he is writing for teens, because teens are intelligent, and will be able to appreciate and understand the great dialog in this novel.
Too rough, too ragged, too torn
The transit strike is over. It's not clear who really won. Le Figaro, the conservative newspaper, gives the credit to Sarkozy for standing tough. Yet there's still no resolution to the underlying issues. There may be more strikes in our future.
This release contains many bug fixes and some new applications. The binary packages could be installed with the installer by using the version “stable 4.3.0″ (or “stable latest”). In case you are upgrading your KDE installation, deselect the skip basic settings checkbox on the first installer page and press next until you are guided to the release settings page, where you can choose the required version.
I got up just after 6am on Saturday, keen to do the run and free up the rest of the day for normal weekend stuff.
On the fifth week of gushing, my BP gave to me
Usually I get sad when Christmas is over. There seems to be so much anticipation and planning put into one day. Then it flies by and before you can blink, it's over. Although this my heart is full. I'm thankful for the year I've had and the people who have held my hand through it. I pray that your Christmas was just as joyful.
6. Why is it a law (at least in my part of America) that you must wear a seat belt, but a bus load of school children ride without one?
Making people happy through truly caring about their lives, feelings and well-being is a gift that few seem to have nowadays. Paul has that gift in bucket loads. Regardless of what life’s thrown at him, and there’s been plenty thrown in his direction along the way, he’s come through it with a smile on his face and a hug ready and waiting for anybody who needs one.
Oh, my God, this song.
The absolute best part of the afternoon -- Regina Spektor played and sang for us. If you don't know her music check it out now. She is amazing. It was a thrill to meet her and find out my books helped her to learn English when she emigrated from Russia as a child.
And then there is the tricky notion of time; and the fact that we so rarely inhabit the present moment, as we're continually not only immersed in our sense of the little egoic self and its likes and dislikes, opinions and emotions, but we're continually lost, most of us, in nostalgia or regret for the past, or hopes and fears for the future.
So sorry I have not written anything the past four-ish days! I am working on a big project and I want it to be perfect for when I release it! I’m not going to tell you what it is, but I’ll give you a hint… It has to do with my last post… hmmmm…
I have such mixed emotions about this...there's unbridled joy on my part, as my work allows me to follow a school calendar, more or less. (It is my opinion that EVERYONE needs to do this by the way. I believe that the right to a two-month long summer vacation should be written into the constitution.)
Follow Me (on Google Friend Connect) (2 Entries)
He ended his rant at WP by taunting it again:
Monumental Holiday is another fast-paced rocker that just has one of those great riffs that's reminiscent of the 90s grunge/punk sound. I can see this song on a soundtrack to an action film. The movie that comes to mind? This tune is perfect for another Crank flick.
While Babyboy napped, Oldest and Middleson were my right-hand men in towing the Christmas bins upstairs. This year I didn't step foot in the crawlspace. My anxious helpers were happy with the adventure. Although I clearly appreciated the help, it was also a reminder of how quickly they are growing up.
They understand the human word but at times play dumb.
That's all you need to tell me, and you don't need to tell me even that. Let your writing show me you're a talented and amazing writer. Show me. Don't tell me.
In the procession I witnessed the marchers, clad out in white robes with blue capes and pointed blue hoods somewhat reminiscent of the Klu Klux Klan, carry elaborate sliver candlesticks. These marchers were closely followed by elegant female mourners dressed in black with the most delicate lace veils running from their heads to the ground.
Matthew 25:24-25 “Then the servant with the one bag of silver came and said, “Master, I knew you were a harsh man, harvesting crops you didn’t plant and gathering crops you didn’t cultivate. I was afraid I would lose your money, so I hid it in the earth. Look, here is your money back.’
It's a 1950's house which had a 'Tuscan' makeover about 10yrs ago.
1/4 teaspoon coarse salt (I doubled this)
Wow, two weeks in a row - I think that may be a new record...
1/4 cup triple sec
...to lump together unbearable harassment with minor teasing is just a mistake. Right, so "unbearable harassment" is appalling and "minor teasing" is nothing to worry about. Got it. But who gets to decide the difference? If not the victim himself, then who? If a child finds his environment unbearable, who are we to say otherwise? And what about things in-between the two extremes as Skenazy describes? What about harassment that's sort of bearable? Is that worth troubling our helicopter-selves with? What about relentless "minor" teasing?
Aliens
How exciting to be the first to receive it in the mail.
day. Which means that most people were smarter then us and
Anyway, so if you didn't tell your loved one anything on Valentine's day, it is not too late. Don't take your loved ones for granted and tell them how much you appreciate and love them everyday :-)
Theodore Roosevelt 1907
On my ipod Touch, the fast, free i-Nigma 4 QR code reader is the most robust of the five or six tested. It is useful on the iPad - just enlarge the screen (the low rez actually speeds browsing.)
But even before the Conservatives got into power, Feldman made the wrong call.
In past several posts under the category Finance, I have been saying that the Governments have no clue as to what is happening on financial front. It is just groping in dark. See another example:
Fight for freedom
How much further will prices drop? Indeed, will prices continue to drop at all? Who knows, I would say the general consensus is that prices will continue to drop. You might find the DAFT.ie 2012 Consumer Attitudes Survey published today of interest though its scientific accuracy is questionable. This is what I believe to be a comprehensive list of forecasts and projections for Irish residential property [house price projections in Ireland are contentious for obvious reasons and the following is understood to be a comprehensive list of projections but please drop me a line if you think there are any omissions].
Names are the only elements of this blog that aren’t truth. That said, my pen name is Lucille Vrai. I chose Lucille because that was my grandmother’s name, and she was a beautiful woman inside and out. (That really was my grandmother’s name by the way). Lucille also means “light,” and this is an image that is personally very important to me. I believe in and love the truth, and light is something that dispels darkness and reveals truth. I chose Vrai because it is French for “true”, and I happen to like short last names.
Indochine - Canary Bay
“No. Usually the medallion can only be used to repel vampires but because you’re wearing it, the demons can sense your angelic blood and it’s drawing them to you. Go to St. Martins and destroy the medallion. I’ll wait for you in front of the cathedral and meet with you after you are finished. Can you be brave for me until then my love?”
- If you have a front loader, check the rubber ring around the door...baby socks love to hide there!*
A right direction,
And so it was that Code Red for me meant I got to sit for two hours in a bus out of Edinburgh and reflect that any severe weather seems to result in me sitting for hours in a traffic jamout through Corstorphine. This is not how Code Red storms are shown in movies.
Both are horror and thriller novelists in their own right. Kilpatrick is the author of the Power of the Blood vampire series and Morrell is perhaps best known for writing First Blood, in which action-hero Rambo first appeared.
Next I popped into Ligne Roset to browse through their amazing sample sale. I like to look in on this company every season, because I am always amazed by their fresh creative style. They use unique materials, and apply them in never before seen ways. Could I decorate an entire room using their furniture, rugs, and lighting – no. But I like to pick one piece to mix in with some more classic styles – usually accent pieces and accessories, although they also have amazing sectional sofas.
Here we are, in the House of More (more commitments, more busy-ness, more work, more fun), and we suddenly find ourselves with nothing to do. This, I believe, is the phenomenon know as……Summer Break.
The Design Team has chosen this blue beauty by AMELIA as the last February Card of the Week. Amelia will also receive a badge to display on her blog and will be in the running for a Guest Designer spot.
Tamara rang a week or so ago and asked if I'd like to accompany her to the Paris Open! I must admit I was at a very low ebb and saw nothing but fear in going so far from home. She coaxed and cajoled and I tried my best to get her to come closer to me this time. I finally wore her down and even got her to come to East Harling on the promise of that most English of experiences...the inauguration of a new village vicar, complete with 40 strong robed choir, Bishops, bell ringing and a fabulous supper. She was a very gracious and enthusiastic guest.
Chickens lay eggs.
